Once again this year, I am very happy to host the Annual Auction to benefit Hand Papermaking Magazine. For those of you not familiar with the publication, it is not to be missed. Anyone with a love of paper should be a subscriber. And for those in the stationery retail business, you might think about offering the magazine to your paper-loving customers.
Structural and functional brain abnormalities generally are measured by noninvasive imaging techniques that provide a picture of the living brain with minimal risk to the individual. Structural imaging techniques, such as computed tomography and magnetic resonance imaging, are used to generate computerized pictures of living tissue. Functional imaging techniques, such as positron emission tomography and magnetic resonance spectroscopy, permit scientists to study cell activity by tracking blood flow and energy metabolism. For more information about imaging, see Alcohol Alert No. 47, “Imaging and Alcoholism: A Window on the Brain.”
And some historians hate historical fiction because History, as a discipline, depends utterly on being honest about the distinctions between a provable fact, a trustworthy record, a reasonable assumption, and pure speculation. But to tell a story "as if" it all happened, novelists must waltz to and fro between probable and possible, across the historians' all-important boundaries, without the reader ever feeling the bump.
Did everyone have a splendid Monday Morning?
It's been a while since I've embraced the camera. I figured since I had some pictures of myself from my birthday dinner last night, I would pick it up again! My mom came to town on Tuesday to celebrate me and Madelyn's birthdays! Last night, we went to My Big Fat Greek Restaurant for dinner! I had been there once before with a couple of friends and the food was really good, and it's fun. I wanted to take the kids because last time we were there they danced and had a guy breathing fire, but they didn't do it last night.
WittCon IX has come and gone, amigos, and this year's con really made an impression! A full day of gaming, costumes, and more, WittCon IX brought out 103 eager gamers to Wittenberg University's Shouvlin Center for some great times, indeed! This marks the second-most attendees in WittCon history--second only to WittCon II, which had the full support of then-local Springfield area game store, Howling Wolf Studios.
I am so looking forward to meeting Jess and other IBOTers in person later in the week!!
Go make Coffee & hop over to loose yourself in this wonderful blog!
the source said.
Combine crumbs and butter until thoroughly mixed. Reserve 1/3 cup for garnish and press the remaining crumbs into 6 individual pie dishes or one 9 inch pie dish. Place pie dish(es) on a rimmed cookie sheet. Put the reserved crumbs in an extra dish baking dish and bake along side the pie crust. Bake in a 350 degree oven for 7-10 minutes to set crust and toast remaining crumbs.
Argentina vs. Mexico today!
I guess I shouldn't tell them that I let my kids watch just about everything. Except Law & Order and those kind of shows. Kids don't need to be watching forensic investigations and shows about sex crimes.
I am currently reading “The Art of Non-Conformity” by Chris Guillebeau, thanks to fellow blogger, Erin’s, high praise of the book. I’d been reading her blog, and her enthusiasm for the book made me seek it out. Then I discovered that the book is about being unconventional, and –being the rebel that I can be– I had to get my hands on a copy of this book. I went to my local library’s website, and found that they only had the audiobook copy… so I asked them to interlibrary loan a paperback copy for me, and they did! (go, library!) So yeah, now I am reading it, and it’s definitely good. I’m enjoying it. I especially like that there is lots about being an entrepreneur — this is something that’s had my focus, the last little bit, as I’ve always wanted to be one, myself, and lately I’ve been researching for my own future business in Graphic Design (not to mention, my new job is all about small business start-ups).
Couple of other random thoughts:
Like most of the country, locals in Sheffield were home bound due to a dramatic change in weather.
Come back on Sunday to see what new challenge awaits you here for August! And, once again we will pick one lucky winner at the end of August for a FABULOUS prize! This time the prize box will contain something newly released at CHA!!!!!! So, plan now to enter both of our challenges for August in order to be eligible to win!!!
It should give me chance to spend time on the internet. Although I have had connection problems every day, and we are also getting regular powercuts.
The process exposes any weaknesses in the plot, any digressions and lack of tension. “Once you get into that, and start exploring story that way, it is a revelatory experience.”
Monk’s recorded legacy is detailed in this comprehensive book, from his first sides to his final composition. The most consistent criticism by others in the 1960s about Monk was that he didn’t write many new songs. Even though he became better known (including a Time magazine cover in ’64) and played to bigger crowds later in his career, the real diamonds he had created and polished as a composer were mostly from the 40s and 50s. All the various medical problems that plagued Thelonious throughout his lifetime are also described, as well as the medications and treatment he received. The curious may just want to read about him dancing around in circles like a whirling dervish, but Monk had a complex personality that is dealt with here in a straightforward way. Robin Kelley should be applauded for such a fine effort, and Monk fanatics will be in heaven with this new treasure trove of inside information on his life. If you are unfamiliar with his work, this is certainly an excellent place to start.
I realize that sometimes things happen that can make a product not work. I was very pleased with the timely replacement of the defective part. The new one …
And I think that's about it for now. I'm going to try to get caught up on blogs this weekend. My schedule is just all out of whack and it seems now I get to sit down on the weekend and read and that's it. So lame. Have a great weekend everybody - and have great races for all of you that are getting ready to toe the line!
“Hardly any Hetalia…”
I accepted the chit without the slightest intention of contacting his friend. I’m not running a legal practice from the Congo and wouldn’t offer counsel to a Welshman of dubious character if I were. The web address will be supplied to private correspondents on request.
-1 piece of that old blanket 18 inches X 64 inches.
Stage 2 – Contact and inform consumers.
One of the first things he said was punch me.
That would be a "free speech" problem, right?
Currently doing the rounds (at least, judging by the number of reports I've received) is this spam...er, solicitation from a new literary agency called Best Solution Author Agency (I've reproduced it exactly as written).
Row Robin Baby Quilt Row 1: Rectangles
“Whoooooa,” I said, dumbstruck, face in the glass. “Dad, what are these?”
Inviting people to events is important, but it’s not evangelism — it is pre-evangelism.
So about going green for your business. There are couple of ways you can do it, and we are looking to help business owners transition into it. Here are some tips:
He is not suing for money. He is asking for a public apology from those teachers, to his son. He is asking for the teacher’s resignation.
Some ladies kicking it in a tide pool grabbed my board.
“And what about this gentleman next to you?”
Hello and good morning, thank you for all your entries for our last challenge and again we have some amazing talented people out there!!
Olay facial moisturizer or facial cleaner $1/1
warm, or strike never.
Archaic, old-fashioned notions are still experienced in third world countries. Human rights belong to all human beings, not just those of us lucky enough to be living in highly educated, progressive countries. Human beings everywhere are the crowning jewel of all God’s creation. How do we stand up for justice, human equality, fairness, dignity, respect, tolerance, mutual love, honor, integrity, and the abundance of all good things?
In other words, the money that is banked by those Covert Human Intelligence Sources (CHIS) who are paid for what they know and what they tell about dissident activity.
To prove that, bring me virtually any good hymnal more than fifty years old, and there will be an entire section in it devoted to Christian warfare. Bring me a hymnal — an older one still, let’s say a hundred and fifty years old — and that section will be even bigger, and the language won’t have been emasculated. It will use words like I just did: violence, to describe your life.
"Ello darling!" Yeah, of course he'd start like that. Well, here's a turn-up, it's Ed 'Stewpot' Stewart. He was a very occasional visitor to the presenting roster, doing thirty shows between 1968 and 1977, of which still exist... wait for it... three! The last show of 1971 (for which he wears an eyepatch for some reason), a last hurrah in September 1977 and this one. In fact having done 21 shows in 1971 and 1972 he had a three year gap before returning for three in 1975, two in 1976 (a second in December - wiped, of course) and a last hurrah in September 1977. This latter period coincides with his time on Crackerjack*, and he did Junior Choice until 1980, and indeed still does on its annual Christmas Day morning revival on Radio 2. Is he proud of that CV? Will he lose his bearings and attempt to introduce Windmill In Old Amsterdam? Let's see.
Two others were unable to carry some heavy planks from a place far away from the camp, after the truck that had been carrying them broke down. Upon arrival in the camp they were summoned from their cell, under instructions from Dan Mashigo, who was the camp's chief of staff, and were taken for flogging at a spot near the camp. One never came back to his cell, and the other one died a short while after returning to his cell.
Andrea was honest, open and reflective about the challenges and discomfort; parent concern about safety and privacy, student interest and engagement growing and waning, and skill building with teachers. She was also clear, blogfolios are a tremendous amount of work. And, yet, Andrea did not seem uncomfortable. The reverse, her energy, excitement and passion were palpable as she shared one example of a strategic upgrade – replacing assessment and writing projects previously on paper and handed in to a teacher with blogfolios that can be shared with an authentic audience. Imagine the possibility!
“I’m sorry we were ornery to you, honeybee,” he whispered, kissing her ear. “But you were so fun to tease.”
One objection to the 1997 study was that the pediatricians may have mistaken fat deposits for breast tissue in some girls, or differed in other ways in assessing the stage of breast development.
The conductor arrived, not dressed in the Malcolm Sargent specials but in a sort of loose sweater and baggy trousers... the lights went down...and the occupants of the box next to the cymbals and timpani got it in spades as with a lunge of his baton he launched his troops into...
Bob was right about a white Christmas because 13 more inches of the white crap fell today, and it's so cold it probably won't melt till August. Took me 45 minutes to get all dressed up to go out to shovel and then I had to poop. By the time I got undressed, pooped and dressed again, I was too tired to shovel. Tried to hire Bob who has a plow on his truck for the rest of the winter; but he says he's too busy. I think the jerk is lying.
Julia Louis-Dreyfus is very funny as the somewhat ditzy Vice President. I don’t know if it is my history with her as an actress, but I am predisposed to laugh at anything that she is in. She has great comic timing and I am looking forward to seeing what she does with this role. The rest of the supporting cast is strong as well, with Hale, Anna Chlumsky and Matt Walsh.
luv coops.xx
One of the unique feature in Singapore, Punggol Beach is known for its rocky shoreline. Natural or man-made – who knows? Punggol Beach is also the site for a massacre during the second world war. There is a signboard at Punggol Jetty indicating its historical impact.
This leaves only those at or near the helm of the Maily Telegraph. You can draw your own conclusions there. Or at least, that’s what my legal advice is. The same applies to those across the Pond formerly famous for their investigative tabloid journalism.
We cut away to the Daily Bugle, where Mary Jane is asking City Editor Joe Robertson if he's seen Peter Parker lately. Robbie replies that he hasn't, Jonah busts into the conversation railing about dinosaurs in Times Square, and MJ cuts out -- she assumes where there's a Spider-Man, there's a Peter Parker. So we cut away to Times Square to see Spidey and T'Challa engaging the dinosaurs. As Spidey's about to wrap things up, Mary Jane tricks a police officer and sneaks past the barricade line. In a strange scene, she looks right at Spider-Man and calls out Peter's name. Of course, we're at this point over a decade before Peter would reveal his dual identity.
Me: "You can have some fruit."
I hope you will be able to join us for this week's Challenge for the chance to win a fab prize of a pack of Promarkers from Letraset
A shot taken below the city, featuring the big boy and my stroller-lugging dad ::
Therefore, IMO, a televised debate, with its scriped sound bytes and gratuitous personal attacks, seems to prove only one thing--that the winner is a better debater than the other person. That the so-called "winner" is only more verbally agile than the "loser."
it quite difficult for me to figure out the snaps.(You can see my issue in this pic ...as well as my difficulty - Oops!)
Some nights, I’d get apologetic calls from my aunt at 2 a.m. “He needs a typewriter.” Or, “Where would I find his slide rule?” We’d also get middle-of-the-night calls to help transfer Grandpa to the nearby commode. Occasionally, it required calling my dad for help, just so Grandpa could, as he said, “Go Number Two.”
Sitting around one night at Rocky Point Club made me aware of all this. The sky was black, the stars were bright, and you got the feeling of being at the prow of a ship, sticking w-a-a-y out there. Off in the distance, looking southwesterly, is Long Island’s Huntington Bay and Smithtown Bay. To your east is the Chatham Rock lighthouse (still for sale!).
2. To hold random stuff (like my empty “post student loan purse”, because despite it’s consistently empty state, it is terribly stylish and gives the illusion that I have money! Ha!)
those of you keeping track...on to #17.
It was no Hollywood blockbuster, (Films shown there rarely are). I went mainly as another friend of mine, James Kirby scored the film, so was keen to hear his work in public.
So, tonight is Halloween.
Combine this mindset with Sweden’s very intense concern for child’s welfare and you get a lot of differences from the US with regard to car seat customs. For example, the infant bucket seats are only used until the children can sit up, and usually people rent them and return them when the baby is 7-8 months. Then you put them rear-facing until they are at least four years old (although apparently it’s a common issue that people turn them around anyway when they are two or three if a new sibling has come along). There’s no controversy otherwise about their being rear-facing so long like in the US, and it’s not like the cars are larger in Sweden (quite the opposite). Britax even makes a car seat specifically for the Swedish market to accommodate people’s desire for kids to rear-face until they are even five or six. (Little Girl didn’t move to a booster seat until age five.)
“We’ve got four of them,” said Winters. “Obviously the kids get two, but what about the other two? Jerry wants them both. I think that’s unreasonable.”
RSVP: No later than March 12th
My grandparents TOOK IT AWAY from me!
Another thing I like about this venue is sometimes bands will actually walk around by where they sell merch. Now until I had gone to a show here I had never seen someone walk around a venue like this, only at club shows have I seen that happen. Usually they don’t walk around venues that big because there are more people and there is more of a chance they will be recognized. While club shows are more intimate and people aren’t always as crazy as they are in bigger venues. The first time I met someone there it was MickDeth and James from Eighteen Visions and it took me so long to go up and talk to them because I didn’t think it was possible they were there. Another time I didn’t get to meet him but as we were leaving the venue J Dog from Hollywood Undead was walking through the crowd like it was no big deal. It’s crazy.
A few hours went by and I watched the demonstrations become larger and more central. This made the police very nervous and so, acting on intelligence I guess, they used their vans to completely block off the entrances to the important streets. It looked as if they were expecting a full scale riot. Instead, we got treated to an antique car rally that wound itself through the streets towards Piccadilly, the area of my next (and last) call of the shift. A 35 year-old woman was reportedly ‘collapsed’ and unconscious in a five star Hotel.
promises I wouldnt keep.
Lily is turning into quite the little Diva. She loves to dress up like a princess and most often wants to wear pink in any fashion. She also always has to have shoes on and accessories (wands, head bands, necklaces etc) She also changes her clothes at least 3 times a day either because a. her clothes get dirty (she doesn't like to wear anything that is dirty, even if it is a little spill or just water) or b. she wants to try on a different princess dress! But she also loves to play in the dirt and wrestle, what a funny combination!
The skeletons without the heads,
like I’ve died inside
as it was from my sweet lady friend Judy.
people fight over who gets grandma’s teapot and my action figures will
Nada.
1 cup finley chopped pecans (I omitted these)
Being a stay at home mother and college student, you can imagine how tight my funds are. I am writing this post because I need help realizing this dream.
Killing: Trayvon Martin (left) was shot dead by George Zimmerman (right) one month ago today in a gated community in Sanford, Florida
*Desert Rose Literary Agency
This winner is Rachelle Vaughn. Rachelle's husband Sgt Ricky Vaughn was killed April 7, 2008, in Iraq. Like my own daughter, Rachelle's son never got to meet his father. Rachelle had expressed interest in the daddy doll immediately, and even though she doesn't blog she entered by leaving a comment and liking on facebook. Rachelle is also very active with Remembering the Brave, a non-profit organization which hosts an annual banquet honoring fallen heroes. Rachelle, I truly think you deserve a doll of Ricky and I am happy to give you a certificate to order one! You can check out a little more about Rachelle and Ricky at Ricky's memorial site.
The young queer child is given the scruples to see through the romanticism and into the unfortunate realities of race and sexuality. What is especially rewarding in this poem is that the gay narrator admits his own helplessness in the matter—he’s as lost as helping his brother’s son as his brother was with him. The nephew “Searches/My eyes for answers.
so enter the fluorescents!
You know how I told the sun to get with it.
I don't know what the official description for MAC Show Orchid is, but to me it's a hot fuchsia pink with a subtle blurple flash!
Other challenges I would like to enter are:
Ya' want to know what I found...this dressing plus my salad combo equals happy, happy, joy, joy...no I did not watch that show...name it if you can.
They were just darling.
65.129852 , -147.470623
I really had no excuse not to attend the parade since A) it happens at night when I'm awake anyway and B) the parade route is one block away from my apartment. Plus at least once a year I like to see my peoples all glittery and stuff. Unfortunately there was what I consider to be a serious dearth of glitter/feather/hi NRG silliness. Too many staid oil company employees and church groups, not enough gyrating. Also, I didn't check my camera batteries before I walked out the door and so no pictures.
Prepare with KRAFT Light House Italian Dressing.
Well I am still sitting here with face ache, but it is thankfully less intense and despite having a cold as well now, life is otherwise good.
VI. Sometimes you might have more than one of the same item or perhaps, the warranty and the receipt do not clearly identify the product to which they belong. In those situations, I recommend you either make a note specifying what that item is or attach a picture of the product.
It is important to keep in mind that this dish does not lend well to substitutions. In fact, an ingredient list with any additions or subtractions simply wouldn’t be a Puttanesca. I like this arrangement because it is confident and simple. Not a fan of one of the ingredients? Not to worry. I myself loathe the sight and smell of olives, but am pleased by the overall body this dish takes on after simmering the parts together as one. Because the ingredient list is short, make this a dinner where quality matters over quantity. Skip the pre-sliced black olives and tubed anchovies paste. Indulge in artisan goods from small, local markets that will assure you quality fine-foods. You all know me buy me now – this certainly doesn’t mean breaking the bank. I am fortunate to live in an area saturated with artisan markets but I also know that several grocery store chains carry fine quality ingredients suitable for such a dish.
There is a story — true or not, I cannot say — that my mother’s cousin found some cigarettes somewhere when she was about five years old decided to try them. When she was caught smoking and scolded by her parents, she apparently defended herself by saying,
Sesame oil - 1 tbsp
I always said I wanted to do a "Blight Blog", and now is the time.
PolyLine is a constant-width stroke that interpolates a set of points. An interesting feature of this stroke is that it is permanently non-interactive, that is it bypasses the normal stroke interaction for mouse or touch points. Instead, the user manually adds vertices to the PolyLine. Like any other constant-width stroke, it is assigned a solid-line drawing engine by default, which produces the drawing below.
Communicate carefully because it is fraught with danger!
4. Don’t drink mint juleps!
Now that’s a good opening. Short. Simple. Sets a mood. Makes you wonder what could come next. Everything a good opening should do. Those Brothers Grimm knew a good thing when they saw it.
4. A centered, space-saving pocket door now connects the kitchen and dining room.
Vintage 8x10 still for WB "Union Depot" (1932) which I just had the pleasure of seeing for the first time on the very same day that this still came in the mail! Very fast-moving and fun pre-code picture with a great cast, I thoroughly enjoyed all 67 minutes of it!
Dr. Dante sat back in his chair. "Rich is a state of mind. Your sister and your father's state of mind, to be more precise. Privileged. You're different."
State PKR elections committee director Abang Zulkifli Engkeh said Sebangan, which is in the Simunjan district, about 100 km from here, had suffered immensely from the cosntant tidal overflow.
Sinuses be damned....I'm powering through and staying the course. Not as much exercise or as vigorous of exercise as I would like, but I will get back to that as my ability to breathe improves. :)
In the past, I haven't sold very much in the breastpump department, but there's a huge market for these items. Thankfully, I have served my time to this line of work and I'm fully retired. But, for the rest of those that are joining the force, they only want the best.
Harold-san's Lament
Here is a fun and cute project I did for the Morgan Kincade School Harvest fair....
Youngest grand looking out his hotel window for the morning hot dog vendor.
Evidence Gatherer#2: Lizzie Guillaume
The conversation should be about informing and persuading, and yet all it ever seems to be about is belittling and berating. It doesn’t matter whether you believe only in the numbers or think it’s all hogwash (do people still use that word?). Why would anyone want to listen to what you have to say if you’re starting your argument with some variation of “here is why you are stupid”? Why would anyone want to talk to you if all you are going to do is scoff at them? And what is the point of discussing hockey (or anything else) only with people who think exactly like you and don’t have any other points of view? Why is it always about how wrong someone is and not about respectfully showing them how you came to your conclusion, instead?
Humperdink's N.W. Hwy.
When I read a group of lines such as this, I mentally fix the paragraph and re-read, to myself, my corrected version. In the case above, I would read it to myself as such:
Creamy Tomatilla Dressing
My whole body trembled. “I’ll try to reach him right away.”
Headphones Report: Top 3 Reasons to Choose Noise Cancelling Headphones
35. Fishboy - Classic Creeps
Is the unconscious our method of experiencing chaos?
Here are a few life updates for those of you wondering...
I know that, even for me, this sounds crazy, but it is what it is. You decipher it however you deem necessary! Our love knows no bounds! Your hate always leads to one finite point! I wish I could tell this tale in a way acceptable to all, but unfortunately, this is a road less travelled! You take the good, throw out the bad, and do with it as you will. God bless you, one and all! That is what is necessary for our existence!
The sex toys were placed on the mantle with care
“Mmmm, how about you try again?”
My heart has a friend.
Thirdly, a good mentor will have more experience and knowledge than you have therefore, they should be seen as an invaluable resource of wisdom (application of knowledge to everyday situations).
6. Now add tomato paste and tamarind paste to the mix and saute for another 3-4 mins.
Kenneth Brass – Trumpet, Edwin Williams – Trombone, Steele L. Seals – Sax
Well, for once I'm not going to summarise the book or give away the plot. Einstein was a genius and by building on his work physicists can now explain the universe (nearly). As long as the speed of light is a fixed universal speed limit. (Which it may not be, according to recent results from CERN. Oh dear.) Read this if you like science, but give it a miss if your eyes glazed over at the title of this post.
We couldn't think of anywhere in Florence we wanted to eat, and it was still a little early for dinner, so we headed for home. We picked up a pizza then went to have a small picnic at the Rose Garden.
She handed it to me,.. I saw crumbs on her forearm... and all I could think was,.. she ate an entire bag of chips and put none on this plate with the sandwich.. "Hey, are you mad at me?"
1. I didn’t put TEN REASONS why I will never be “Freshly Pressed” as my title. Everyone knows you need a numbered list.
Round an island there below,
As I think about the 4 lives that God has grown in me and given to me to love I am amazed. I cannot imagine life without any of those children, even if I was a little unsure about what He was doing. As I imagine the pain and heartache and loneliness that a woman can feel when she becomes pregnant when not expecting it or wanting it I am overwhelmed and just want to reach out and hug them. Jesus wants that also. He wants us to know that life is important. My life, your life, and the life of the children he gives us whether planned or unplanned are important. He is full of love and forgiveness for us and those around us.
you used to share things with me
For You are their light,
Total Cost: $7.69
That's most of my cross stitch minus a few other projects and my books. I've suggested that I could post a new picture every week for a few years and never have to take a stitch. I wasn't kidding you. There is a reason, I call myself the Queen of WIPsluts.
3/4 cup fresh squeezed orange juice
We wish you peace and love until tomorrow. Good day.
Every palm Sunday I am filled with emotions of overwhelming
“Bad news, then?” the sculptor asked quietly.
The Japanese Princesses
Defoe and X Factor winner Alexandra, 23, have been happy to display their togetherness in public and are known as a celebrity couple.
Another project we’re excited to tell you about has been brewing cross-continent since the American Society of Anaesthesiologists conference in Chicago last year. When the Department of Anesthesiology at the University of Florida presented a (giant!) cheque for $33,700 for Lifebox, we took a gameshow-style photo and then got down to business.
Have you ever noticed that even if your first impression of a new fashion trend is distaste, when enough people start wearing it, it can grow on you? I can faintly remember a time when I thought skinny jeans were the most unflattering invention…
If President Obama is re-elected next year, he ought to consider appointing Ms Degeneres to his cabinet. A woman of her populist instincts could keep him in touch with the voters and give him sound advice on when to bare his chest. She could also accompany Mrs Clinton on her overseas trips, ironing her panty girdle and licking her into shape before her encounters with foreign statesmen. Any tomcat who dares to meow at Hilldog will be paying a visit to the vet.
"...when brands lose their minds and go off the rails, their next move is usually to snap back to their roots. With that in mind, here's the kind of campaign I expect Pepsi...to come up with:Concept: Happy, youthful people of every color from all over the global world are drinking Pepsi while the most expensive pop stars of every color in the global world are singing about Pepsi." Well, guess what? According to Ad Age on Monday...
“The fact that NOAA has missed the ball catastrophically on the tracking and effects monitoring of this spill is inexcusable,” said Rick Steiner, a University of Alaska marine conservationist … “They need 20 research ships on this, yesterday.”
Strangely, as the people got poorer, the hill in front of the can seemed to get steeper, making the job even harder.At first one stick of economic-bailout dynamite was enough to blow the barrel-sized debt a huge distance and all the leaders and bankers congratulated themselves on a job well done.But gradually the magic barrel grew larger and the cement inside transmuted into toxic lead.It required much more financial dynamite to move it.
And to top it all off i did not get a decent mail or a phone call calling an end to it all.
Which brings us to Pam (Who looked beautiful as ever). Pam asking to be released as a last act of desperation. Pleading, crying, not understanding? Where is the snark? The witty one liners? The Pam I love tells Eric a few facts of life even when he doesn’t want to hear them? The Pam that killed Eric’s best assassin when Bill sent him after her. That is who Eric needs right now, not crying, scared, remorseful Pam.
Are you liking the art cover for I’m All Yours? Drop a comment below!
7. In The Western World:
There are many folks who will be upset by my contact with you, some whom have said/wrote that I had direct contact with them were in fact, duped many times over by what you could call mini me’s emmm funny but I just gotta say it. Now I won’t name names here as to me it don’t matter none. But I gotta tell you this, some folks are playing games and have been for quite some time. I don’t mind games and all. But games where people get hurt, that’s where the buck has just gotta stop. So as me being fake well its like this, I guess I kinda am, in such away that I hide behind a mask/Internet its like that guy what’s his name man I’m so bad with names, any way he said something like- We all wear masks, and the time comes when we cannot remove them without removing some of our own skin.
I will start by mentioning Lana del Rey for no better reason she is on my short list is best defined by the way she has become popular and unpopular at the same thing happens once in a blue moon.
The next day we woke up early to a day at the beach. The first item on the itinerary was surfing. Unfortunately for me, I was unable to participate because I injured my foot earlier that week. It was in the process of healing, but as much as I wanted to try my hand in the waves I knew that it could result in a set back. Instead, I acted as the paparazzi and happily snapped away with my camera while the morning lighting glistened off the ocean. Next, was ocean kayaking which I did participate in. My friend, Karissa and I were determined to catch some waves. We did and also managed to tip over a few times, and my all time favorite somehow I ended up underwater with the kayak stuck on top of me. Next, we walked through the town, had lunch, bought some postcards, and just enjoyed the moment. Relaxing and slowing down is definitely something I am trying to learn to do and enjoy. After four months of studying, backpacking and literally being in a different place every weekend, this is extremely different for me. I am looking forward for the Aussie way of relaxing to rub off on me.
From my autograph book:
When such gross injustices, deceit, and hypocrisy exist under “international law” in both Libya and now Syria, it is clear that such “international law” is but a system of control exercised by a minority against others on a global scale. “International law” is revealed as merely the neo-imperial edicts of the global corporate-financier oligarchs, dressed up as “humanitarian concerns” even as they prop up terrorists from Libya to Syria, and beyond. Even as the UN begins to admit that indeed the Syrian rebels are in violation of the ceasefire, they only do so as the violence runs demonstratively rampant and out of control.
But this year was completely different. You take on a heap of extra stuff when you're a single parent of two teenage boys ... but you also lose a few things that, quite frankly, shouldn't have been your responsibility anyway. Like organising the in-laws' presents. So that was one down.
The fear-porn scenarios I have heard seem utterly fanciful – particularly since the majority of the military will turn on those who try to harm the public in any way.
The book begins, like Well-Met in Kith’takharos, with a colour map of the region, an explanation of how and why the authors design adventures, and an outline of the scenario, which has 10 events or encounters. There are three different adventure hooks to draw in the players, depending on whether they played through the earlier scenario or are fresh into the village.
Pickled Asparagus with Mustard Seed (makes about 3 pints)
My family loves chips & salsa, and it is often an important ingredient in my cooking as well. We go through over a dozen quarts of tomato salsa most years, so last week I decided to stretch our horizons and try a new recipe I found for raspberry salsa. When it was all said and done, I was happy with the outcome and am already thinking about what I will do with it. :) Almost immediately I started thinking about the peaches and zucchini in my fridge that needed using, trying to contrive how I could turn them into a salsa. I've made peach salsa before & like to use it for a chicken recipe that my family enjoys, and zucchini has such a neutral flavor that I was sure I could use it as a filler with the peach. I decided to take the basic recipe from the raspberry salsa I'd just finished, tweek it and see if I could create a peach zucchini salsa recipe that I would be happy with. I ended up with a product that I am excited to share with my family and friends. If you like fruit salsa, you will want to give this a try as well. :)
2. Where do you do your most creative thinking – and when? (e.g. particular time of day, conscious space e.g. dreams)
I have watched with increasing dismay over sermons that charge one up and then suck away all that the person has rather than uplift beyond that day. When I was younger, I agree that I didn’t know much about giving to God but, with many evangelists everywhere, the subject has become a lot clearer but, many preachers abuse this knowledge which they shed!
What's been interesting me lately, is how other people have the power to make you feel a certain way. Perhaps I am alone in this, but I feel like my whole being changes depending on who is around me. With some people, I feel like a strident maniac. Around others, I feel myself recoil, my voice becoming almost shy and unsure. Some people make me feel like I have to lead and be in charge. Some people make me feel girlish and superficial. Others make me feel butch. Some people make me feel stupid, others make me feel irritatingly pompous. Answer me this, readers: does this happen to you as well? There are very few people who I can be around, and feel, simply, myself. This A guy made me feel extremely comfortable and at ease, and he seemed to be a very generous and kind spirit. He came with me to collect my student card from the office, and as I was screwing around trying to open the enveloppe, he took my stuff off me so I could do it properly. I really appreciate little gestures like that. Then he was craning his neck trying to read the blurb, and had a few questions about how to register, how to get a French phone, etc. I just found him very touching.
and into passion you draw me;
There were a few notable exceptions within the party including London Mayor Ken Livingstone who refused to enter in to political Muslim-baiting and at one point some sections of the media turned on him damaging his own political campaign in the English capital.
The process of individuation and democracy must be exhausted as these terms – democracy, interactivity, agency, etc. – are blindly wielded in not only the art world but also the world theater at large. How is a sense of agency, empowerment, or democracy within these theaters even possible based on certain superficial or superimposed ideals glazed over agents and bodies in society? Identity must be valid within one’s self. If unity is multiplicity, as discussed by Nietzsche or even Spinoza, we cannot solely rely on a constituted subject as the result of a derogatory machine that works, subjugates and “reposes on a double identity: of the thinking subject, and of the concepts it creates and to which it lends its own presumed attributes of sameness and constancy . . . In thought its end is truth, in action justice. The weapons it wields in their pursuit are limitive distribution (the determination of the exclusive set of properties possessed by each term in contradistinction to the others: logos, law) and hierarchical ranking (the measurement of the degree of perfection of a term’s self-resemblance in relation to a supreme standard, man, god, or gold: value, morality). The modus operandi is negation: x = x = not y. Identity, resemblance, truth, justice, and negation . . . The end product would be ‘a fully legitimated subject of knowledge and society’ . . . endlessly reproduced and disseminated at every level of the social fabric.” [6] An X = X not because X is not equal to Y but because X is X. This demarcates an indiscernible zone of autonomy within the social landscape that allows for identity to stand in and of itself. A zone that is relationally and affectively interconnected with its milieu. Zoe herself is emblematic of this concept as she still lives within the environments and personally interacts with all of those in her work. The question now becomes how, in these “indiscernible” zones of autonomy, do we truly identify the subject and give it voice? How do we release it from the territorialzed confines of society at large? How do we allow for it’s becoming?
One note I should add...don't be afraid to use games for your own purposes. For example: use the Scrabble tiles to just make words, without actually playing the game by the rules; for that matter, alter rules however it makes sense for your players; and don't keep score if it's frustrating for any of the players. In my opinion, it's best to have the game serve your purposes, rather than always strictly follow the rules as written.
As most of you know, I share this special day with my twin sister...my best friend. We are another year older and wiser. How the heck did this happen? 33?? Really, 33??! Yikes. It feels like just yesterday we were kids running around without a care in the world. Now we have 2 husbands and 3 kids between us. What the!? Even though we definitely aren't kids anymore, life sure is sweet :)
1953 + ‘54 + ‘55 The Tournament of Roses Parade (line producer for live broadcast of three successive New Year’s Day Parades in Pasadena.)
He then goes on to say that the numbers “That he has” do not agree. The viewership has increased he says. WHAT! Talk about apples compared to pears.
by Steve Taylor
You might not be able to have your cake and eat it too, but you can with fish!
Next up I got to get into some OLD School Gaming with an old friend of mine who came into town for the Con and one of the players was an old buddy I used to game with but haven't been able to in a long time, due to work and such.
Last Sunday as I was leaving the church I needed to make a quick restroom stop. I closed the door to discover that someone had put paper towel into the toilet (the church has a cistern system and we have paid thousands of dollars for one problem or the other this year alone. Paper towel going down the system creates difficulties.) At any rate - I fished it out and then went to flush the toilet to discover that it was busted. They just don't make toilets like they used to...
tattoo immediately. She had worked it on a witch a year ago. She felt the blood
Eliminating the deterrence argument reduces the debate to the issue of retribution and the nagging question of whether the legal system is capable of error. Simply stated, it is. Many wrongful convictions have been made throughout time, and with the Death Penalty, once it is applied, it is too late discover or correct errors.
But at the end
● How do I qualify?
003.019 YUSUFALI: The Religion before Allah is Islam (submission to His Will): Nor did the People of the Book dissent therefrom except through envy of each other, after knowledge had come to them. But if any deny the Signs of Allah, Allah is swift in calling to account.
I forced myself to like winter.
We conducted an extensive investigation of the occupy movement to identify the people involved, as well as the money and influence behind it. What we found is that nothing related to the “Occupy Movement” is what it appears. In fact, nothing from Arab Spring, to DHS policy and beyond is what it appears to be. We found unsettling relationships between people, elected and appointed officials, groups, and organizations that extend back many years.
1 pinch fleur de sel
Now that we are back in the United States, we are looking to replace some of those items we so happily gave away. We hope to add these things back into our life slowly and be discerning about what we really need. We’ve asked our community to share their excess with us as we shared with them. What we have found is that we continue to have more than we need, because our friends both have more than they need and are willing to share it with us.
Yoga is so much more than asana on a mat in a studio. Yoga is seeing the pain in others, in yourself, and healing it, breath by breath. Yoga is seeing the beauty and divinity in every living thing, in the broken, ghostly inhabitants of a geriatric psych ward, in the tension of an overworked therapist, in the sweetness of a gentle dog.
8. Garnish with chopped coriander leaves and serve hot.
show details 12/8/09
So since I don't have a terribly exciting Independence Day story to tell, I am going to write about this year and the best early birthday present I could have possibly received.
- sesame oil
The positives: This could be a platform for advertisers, as their ads could be featured on the screen as customers shop. It would be the most profitable for stores and could even be called The Smart Cart. The convenience factor is another plus, as it even crosses items off your shopping list, essentially managing the whole shopping process for you.
1-2 cloves of garlic, crushed
Stupidity
“You heard about the plane crash, but you didn’t know I was on it,” he said, guiding her to a soft bench seat at the foot of the bed. “They notified you. Or maybe that guy who was just here. The guy you’ve been fooling around with for two or three years. He saw it on the news, and he told you about me. And then you flew home, and you ran to his house. But then he was there with another woman. And you realized that the guy you’ve been cheating on me with all this time was also fooling around with other women too, not just you. What a surprise. The cheater was cheating.”
If you are not sure if your community, locale, area, county or state prohibits adult material,
While I prefer classic seat clusters, there are also many designs that deviate into all sorts of creative directions. On this Bates B.A.R. bicycle, the seat stay caps look like sharpened pencils and meet the main lug at the bottom.
I didn’t love my time in the theater. In fact, after I performed in the stage version of this story, I gave up acting and changed my minor from theater to psychology. Now, in retrospect, I’m damn proud to have been a small part in bringing this story to life, because the story is that good, and this film is better than just good. See this if you haven’t.
The quick intervention of Datuk Seri Najib Tun Razak to put the scheme on hold has been well received by the civil service with the sentiment that he had put a stop to what many felt was grave injustice. Much progress has since been made to end this impasse.
She whispers...
Do I think that Egalia will succeed in creating a generation of children entirely free from their stereotypical gender roles? No. But do I expect that this approach will in both overt and subtle ways influence individual children in their attitudes about themselves and others when it comes to gender? Quite possibly, especially since the entire learning community, from teachers and administrators to parents, seem to be on board. It's an educational experiment, and if you've read here for long, you'll know that I think that's what education ought to be every day: a collaborative experiment between children and the adults in their lives.
15. Checks arrive in my mailbox every single day.
That is a scene from my novel A Spark of Heavenly Fire. I’ve been wondering if the characters’ fear was a bit over the top, because it is only a cornfield after all. But now I know I didn’t go far enough.
The Best Digital SLRs We’ve Tested – If you’ve outgrown your point-and-shoot camera, the next logical step is an interchangeable lens model. But buying one isn’t exactly a no-brainer, since it means committing to a system of lenses and accessories too. Our best-of list is a great place to start your search for the perfect SLR camera/lens combo.
KLF What time is love UK
This is the problem. By allowing corporations to get back into politics (they were before—see this post), we allow foreign nationals to influence our elections. I know that people in other countries watch our elections with great interest becauise of the power this country has, but to allow them to influence them is a whole ‘nother thing.
“Yes,” replied Lieber.
Would you like more Twitter followers and be introduced to more neat blogs and businesses out there? Come and join us!!
I have a point to this story, in which I will get to, promise. The mail delievry guy comes in often so he is able to distinguish whose new and whose not. He began to talk to her as I stood beside her and she also felt very comfortable telling him, her past history. He on the other hand was different from me, he decided to give her his opinion. He felt that she has a negative out look on life - although he does not know her own journey he did say 'your are the captain of your destiny, you have a say'. Out of everything they talked about that interested me the most...and maybe right now this individual does not agree or even realise that that is really good advice. Its sometimes hard to take advice but we always have to remember that when you think you have it bad, someone out there really does have it worst. Your not alone in this place that we sometimes feel like we are...we just need to learn from the past, and put your mind forward, you gotta think positive because your mind works stronger than you think. Anyways...I just thought I'd share strong words that came my way yesterday.
I blame my sudden button tidying compulsion on receiving this gorgeous box of goodies from Pur-ple. Its so lovely. I featured it on my Christmas gift ideas list but didn't get it so decided to treat myself! Izzy has already helped herself to one of everything!
Weekend Joys
On it goes. There's nothing there which isn't an echo of something everyone has seen before. Our interesting idea just withered and DIED under the suffocating weight of cliches.
i make all my images, animations or videos to be 640 pixels wide in my posts, so that they are the same width as my text column. but as you may have different specs for your blog page, you will want to change your image width accordingly.
Possibly the homeliest foursome ever to trouble Saturday morning TV, Vanilla was a girl group from Barnet, London consisting of sisters Frances and Alison Potter, plus their friends Alida Swart and Sharon Selby. Releasing just two singles for EMI in 1997 and 1998, it is the first of these we feature today.
You have fled like the hart,
December 2011 Issue of Insurance News Net Magazine. Steven A. Morelli is editor-in-chief for InsuranceNewsNet.
So if anyone's read my bio, they know I'm in grad school.
And I will have nothing planned in the form of a craft, project or poem on the blog here like the other bloggers. They have been furiously pounding out the Mama Day crafts for weeks around these parts and have I contributed anything?
I think you can see what I'm getting at. We're not talking Santa Sangre or The Seventh Seal here. These are films that cater to the drive-in market, for filler on triple bills and all-night movie marathons. They need no plot, no characters and they certainly need no acting. And lemme tell ya brother, all of René's products follow through on those counts.
1-3/4 cups whole wheat pastry flour
So thought I would share this layout with you
In case you are confident you own these characteristics then it will pay to effectively market you to ultimately those hiring members for his or her yachting staff. Construct a great working resume that will outline your entire skills, personal characteristics and fitness to complete the job. And initiate submitting that resume. Luxury charter yacht jobs could be among the most enjoyable positions in existence.
“Yeah, I know, but what if we can’t find him?” one of the others responded. “What if we have to kill him?”
With the lowest “Points Against” even now, it was clear early on that Jesus wasn't going to let you pagan infidels score against me. And nobody was more floored than I to see the vast number of last-minute horrific injuries Jesus would inflict upon your pagan infidel teams to ensure my 2011 triumph.
Looks like I've really gone an done it this time. I knew there was the potential for a rally but I didn't want to reduce as I had done this before with the AUDUSD short and regretted it. Far too much on. I get the feeling this is a short covering rally but could easily turn into a full blown actual rally. A full rally could create a head and shoulders set up, but it will be too late for me by then.
First, THANK YOU everyone for being so patient after my website crashed yesterday. That was so frustrating! But I want to publicly thank two of my most favorite men in the world, Norm (@mrdirby) and Andy (@techburgh) for working their magic and getting me back online.
When I look back over my relatively short life on this earth, I’m always so thankful about just how lucky I’ve been. Born in the early ‘80s I grew up in the north of London with my parents and three sisters in a 4 (technically five) bedroom house with a south facing garden and off street parking. The local bus started its route about 20 yards from my front door and finished at my doorstep. Unlike pretty much all of my friends, my parents never separated, and still live a blissful life together today.
You motifs will be joined either to one side or two sides
- Dermatological effects
Pull me like a bass drum
5 walking
Let us not forget, there was no reason for City Hall to ban the use of Dataran Merdeka, nor for the 11th hour court order restricting crowd movement. If anyone had planned and maneuvered for an untoward incident to occur, and is to blame for the ensuing police violence, it is the Umno-BN and its agencies. And Najib, as the head, has to take the responsibility.
My cabbie suitors seem to belong there, right next to a little pile of questions I have about people.
I saw my doctor today. I haven't posted anything about it but last fall it was discovered I had early stage small cell cancer in my left lung. After some pretty aggressive treatment during September - December, I'm officially in remission! That was the expectation, but still, I didn't want to constantly field questions while undergoing treatment.
3. DP 1898 04:35
I really don't scare easily. I run far. 100 miles through the night... but... the surge of going from 0 to 55 in a matter of seconds made me start to pray. Well, sort of. It was more a list of things I was thankful for and maybe an amend or two, and perhaps a request that if we were to crash, I wouldn't be rendered incapable of either running or playing the violin.
Much depends on the games of course, but as a hardware device the Vita is spectacular. We don’t think it’s even that expensive. That sentence might get under some people’s skin, but have you seen how much the iPhone 4S costs right now? It’s £500 for the 16GB version.
I am not as eloquent as Mr. Hemingway, so I will only second his statement...
Northrend quests
The morning workshop I attended was "Teaching Creative Writing to Non-Writers." The instructor was really great and she gave us some awesome ideas for ways to engage non-writers. We participated in several very fun and productive writing exercises that I can see being useful for teaching both creative writing and adaptable to academic/composition writing. So I was inspired after the workshop.
Belgian Strong Ale? Quad? I was expecting an imperial stout or some such, but it pours too fast and is too light. Nice, rich brown with a huge tan head.
Hours had passed and the sun dipped down into the horizon. Overhead the canopy caused the jungle to be thrown into darkness sooner than the explorer had anticipated. He had lost count of the times he had to stop and search for the bird’s next perch. William caught up with the bird and watched it fly west into the black jungle. When would he get there? Had he been following this animal for no reason? The questions ran through his mind as he fought against snagging branches and tripping roots.
It is therefore in their interests to keep the irritation they cause governments below a certain threshold if they wish to continue their activities at all. But they must keep it close to this threshold in order to be effective as judged by their own standards. This requires a keen awareness of lines that must not be crossed and the political scenes in their countries of origin and action. In effect, they must conduct the same cost-benefit analysis as governments (as outlined above), and conduct it accurately enough to arrive at the same conclusions. This will require a combination of ‘empirical research’ and political savvy that would be non-trivial to acquire and update as necessary.
It's so nice to wake up to those big eyes, even if they look a little crazy in this pic :)
Moo Yul has been receiving death threats and when one of his teammates steals a drink from his water bottle and collapses, it’s clear that his stalker is serious which means that he really needs a bodyguard.
Here's what he e-mailed me:
I tell you all the time
Parents control their children in the belief that if they hold onto their kids tightly enough the things they fear the most won't happen. Parents try to protect their children from certain influences while trying to expose them to others. Parents try to make their children behave, teach them lessons, and prepare them for the realities of life.
Toward the end, the main character is forced to feel a sense of well-being a la brainhacking. He feels this way and so manufactures justifications for the horrible things that have occurred. This feeling of well-being supersedes bonds of love, family, what we call decency, etc.
The most significant developments since the inaugural forum is the establishment of the Regional Universities Network, chaired by professor David Battersby, Vice Chancellor, University of Ballarat. RUN now joins the other university groupings as a key player in the tertiary sector. There are six universities in this grouping. However, several of the other metropolitan universities have extensive regional service. Equally important is the role of VET in regional education. This includes the TAFEs as well as private RTOs.
Or I shall live your epitaph to make
Azad praised the speech of King Abdullah, Custodian of the Two Holy Mosques, in which, he said, four points have been outlined for maintaining order in the society.
Combine rice, milk, salt, cinnamon, sugar and raisins in a heavy bottomed saucepan. Bring to a rolling boil, over medium heat, while stirring constantly. Reduce heat and simmer slowly for 15 minutes, stirring often.
1 minimal
To be honest as I was reading this book, I was so in shock that this was true that I didn’t get mad. I was in mad shock, if this makes sense. I was too in shock to feel anything else at the moment. Part of the reason I feel like I could not get upset was because this happened in the past and I did not get much satisfaction after reading this book. This is not the authors fault but I blame Tania. She was a chicken when it came to the truth and her reasoning and I felt like she played dodge ball when it came to answering the question of Why?
Tuesday, 01 May 2012
Anger Management (20) – Destroyed 5 vehicles using a Finisher
I visited the largest Islamic mosque in India, primarily because I like to learn and discover new things about different religions and cultures and I was also impressed by the architecture. I had gone to great lengths to ensure no flesh was on show, I even wore a head scarf for fucks sake! Yet when I was at the entry gates, I was spoken to and treat like shit! This made me angry inside. Obviously, I was not permitted to make eye contact with the Muslim men manning the entry point, nevermind give them a piece of my mind. At that point, I had lost my ‘freedom of speech’ and my right to express an opinion, due to being a woman! I was expected to walk behind my male travelling companion, look to the floor, show no physical affection, make no eye contact with any males and despite being ‘covered up’ I was physically pushed around and a gown was thrown at me to put over my, already excessive layers of clothing! Being a woman in that situation made me worthless and made me feel like I was a second class citizen who should be controlled by men! The mosque itself was an interesting experience, shame about the Muslim people I encountered. They boast that the Islamic religion and culture is one of peace. I didn’t witness anything ‘peaceful’ about the aggression shown towards me! It was oppressive, controlling, overbearing and excessively dictatorial, especially toward women. I don’t recall seeing many women, if any, walking in the streets surrounding that mosque in Delhi.
"Mommy sometimes I feel like little hearts are coming out of the top of my head."
San Jose PRIDE, in collaboration with the San Jose Sharks NHL professional hockey team, will hold the Second Annual LGBT Night at the Shark Tank on Monday, March 19, 2012 at 7 PM for an exciting evening against the Anaheim Ducks.
"You've Got a Friend in Me" (Toy Story) (Music and lyrics by Randy Newman)
The National Weather Service has issued a Red Flag Warning for Thursday and Friday from 11 AM to 8 PM MST due to strong winds and low relative humidity. Winds will be from the southwest from 15 to 25 mph with gusts of 35 to 45 mph. Conditions will be dry with relative humidities of 5% to 12%. Critical fire weather conditions can be expected today through Sunday.
For 'The Line, The Cross, The Curve' Bush hooked up with
Glad no one read manipulation of my mind,
“Following the order of the bona fide spiritual master is the only duty of the disciple, and this completely faithful execution of the order of the bona fide spiritual master is the secret of success.”
For all those who have it harder than I do....
shrunken sheet music or music notes
We're not going to lie. It took awhile. We read that blog like crazy, pouring over every entry, studying every critique like it was God's gift to writing. But even then it didn't work the first time.
Tucked away in one of the city’s ‘loins’ – or lanes, this one evocatively called Turk’s Head Yard - this venerable city centre pub is the oldest in Leeds. It’s an institution. Culturally it’s quite significant in that it’s one of the remaining pubs in the city that hasn’t had the wrecking ball of modernism applied to it. All of its contemporaries have gone the way of progress by and large with a couple of less noteworthy exceptions.
The infant had been observed behaving sickly ever since birth when, on May 18, 2010, researchers saw the chimpanzee mother, Masya, carrying the dead body of her offspring. Masya continued to carry her lifeless child until the following day when observers were present to record what they saw next. The infant was placed in a clearing while Masya sat a short distance away staring at the motionless form. Researchers recorded over the next hour as the mother approached her offspring 23 times to place her hands on the child. 21 of these contacts were directed toward her offspring’s face or neck. At the end of this display Masya once again picked up her infant and carried her to the center of the social group about 20 meters away. When she laid her infant down the other group members, eight in total, proceeded to gently touch, stroke the dead infants belly, and groom it with straw. After about twenty minutes Masya retrieved the body and walked off. The next day Masya was observed on her own, she had let go of her dead child.
07/20 - Washington, D.C Jiffy Lube Live
I couldn't help but add this to my post. This is my grandmother and her sister (on the right) in a pre-1915 REO -- I think. Notice the position of the steering wheel on the right side. I am told that, until 1915 they were placed such to allow the driver to avoid the ditch on the side of the road and keep the car on solid ground. Also note the wooden wheels, and lantern which could be taken off to guide one to the house after dark. This would have been Sandstone, Minnesota I am guessing since that's where she lived.
Hugs and love to all.
First link.. the most recent proof showing the ‘professionals’ using the terminology of “circle sweeps” .. “square waves” .. and “sawtooth sweeps” —– the terms I’ve coined this past year WERE ‘HAARP rings’ , “Scalar Squares”, and “Stairstep patterns”….. both refer to the same process…… spikes of frequency are emitted from ground based facilities (like H.A.A.R.P. in Alaska for instance) to HEAT the upper atmosphere (and beyond) via High frequency VHF .. also using VLF (very low frequency) to produce the same outcome via a process called “Efficiency Scaling”… when VLF changes into VHF in the upper ionosphere.
"For God has not given us a spirit of fear, but of power and of love and of a sound mind." 2 Timothy 1:7
I use the same 3 main colours for the rest of the body using the Apricot & Oatmeal to create the shadowing & then finishing with the blush. I only usually do the face once I find that a second coat is not needed. If you do think you need a 2nd coat I always wait til it dries cus it does darken slightly once dry & so it could be that you would of been happy with the end colour. Also you always want to try not to wet the card too much as it will cause bleeding.
Mr. Bull said the "clear purpose" of what the Panthers were doing was to "intimidate voters with whom they did not agree." He also said he overheard one of the men tell a white poll watcher: "You are about to be ruled by the black man, cracker."
"Slow but steady progress wins the race." ~ Aesop's, "The Tortoise and the Hare"
Now to me you apply
As you can see, the ending has been left open and it will soon be time to write the follow up. What do you think should happen to the characters (the ones that are alive)? Anything can happen, in fact, the more bizarre the storyline is, the better. But this time the story will be worked on fully before the music gets shat out. I did have an idea about a John Motson type character who time travelled back and forth in a banana shaped space ship to interact with the characters but I think that's already been done...
1 TB vegan worcestershire sauce
Why don’t you look at him? Do you see?
Things were going very well. We were both quite fond of one another. Conversation was light, entertaining and quite enjoyable. We shared many things in common and were very much ‘on the same page’ when it came to most subjects.
“We're big girls and boys now. We have to go back.”
A few local teams made it to the high school state basketball championships in Des Moines, so we decided to make a weekend of it. We dropped Jared off at Grandma & Grandpa's house (because we didn't think he'd have much fun with us), and treated the older kids to a fun filled, hotel staying, donuts and ice cream eating, toys playing, movie watching weekend. We surprised the kids when we picked them up a bit early from school on Friday afternoon, and then headed off to the Friday night game. When we arrived at the hotel afterwards, we swam for a little while and then fell asleep watching cartoons on TV.
Schwob was a one-off, but he was greatly influenced by English and American writers. He discovered Edgar Allan Poe whilst still a child, and he translated Robert Louis Stevenson’s The Dynamiter into French. He crammed a great variety of literary endeavour into his all-too-short life, and was much admired by contemporaries such as Paul Valéry and Guillaume Apollinaire.
1. Tickets to visit the Cambridge Butterfly Conservatory.
Along with the new hybrid is also the new turbo diesel R18 called the R18 Ultra.
A former foster-care kid now rich beyond his wildest dreams, Raoul Moreno runs a camp for needy children in Fool's Gold, California. After his last relationship, Raoul thought he was done with women and commitment. Still, he can't get sweet, sexy Pia out of his mind—and proposes a crazy plan. But can such an unconventional beginning really
With all the LCD televisions on the market, you may have a hard time deciding which to buy. But after you read this review, you might decide that the Samsung LN40A550 40-inch television is just the right one for you.
21. Applause (01:41)
blurs and mind snapshots
I was humiliated. My own son regularly ran away from home and apparently was spilling my secrets to the neighborhood. I think his perspective was that if I’d just understood his genius and catered to his needs, like fresh pastries and cappuccino, then he wouldn’t have to go out and have his needs met elsewhere, like in the garbage dumpster. (Laura and I were sitting and having breakfast one morning when I glanced out to find him clambering up the side of the communal dumpster and slipping over the side down into the garbage where he happily wallowed in coffee grounds and cold French fries. Eventually I had to get a folding chair to go in after him and then let him climb up my body and out.)
It was as if this horrible twist in history had somehow caused Barbara to blossom. As he heard her grunting in the hallway — likely crushing in the head of some elderly neighbor with a lamp or shower rod or something — Dale tried to decide whether or not he was comfortable surrendering his position of power. He’d had it for so long, had grown so accustomed to it, that the thought of relinquishing his role was both liberating and as frightening as any of those flesh-hungry things. Just thinking about it caused his heart to race.
It makes me feel peculiar just to see those words there on the screen, but it's true.
I sat down on the bar stool. Man it feels good to take a load off!
You can't believe you once smoked.
Reality: Our 10:25am flight was delayed by over 3 ½ hours. Apparently, a mechanical problem was not easily fixed, but this was discovered only after half the flight’s passengers had already boarded the plane. I was on my way to the plane; my husband, who I thought was right behind me, had been stopped at the gate. Everyone was asked to return to the terminal. A plane would have to be flown in from another airport. An omen, perhaps?
My next thought was the washing of the water. As the water lapped at my feet I thought about the washing of my spirit. God’s washing. Taking all that junk and washing it out in the ocean, burying it on the ocean floor.
Stage #1 – I’m shocked at being shown love, but then I get suspicious. I start to ask doubting questions. Who is this person? Why is this person being so nice? What’s the catch?
Good afternoon! Guess what!? It's almost Friday! One of my college roommates is coming to visit this weekend and I can hardly wait to stay up late and giggle like we used to in the good 'ol days (I know... I'm not THAT old, but sometimes it feels like college was AGES ago!).
“We are into unpopular territory, but to deal with something like alcohol that is damaging the fabric of the nation we need to raise prices. There is a direct connection between the price of alcohol and consumption.”
Well there is so much to say, but I think I am going to have to wait till I return till I can express myself in words ... My heart processes, I get a little quiet, and then I rant a lot in my head - so it is best to give it a few days till I can allow God to speak through me and NOT MYSELF DOING THE TALKING ...
Take advantage of only $1 shipping on all other items until March 31st 2010!
I feel like so much weight has been lifted off of my shoulders. For the longest time I felt like there was a piece missing in my life because I had lost contact with Josh and Nathan. I felt a little empty. This week has completely turned that around for me. I am so happy to have found them again and I can't wait for the day that we get to reunite in person. I love those guys so much! All four of these people are some of the greatest friends ever. It's amazing how you can go so long without seeing someone then it all comes flying back once you reconnect. I feel so blessed! What an amazing week.
That’s why I give myself to no one else but You
It’s not like Patty has a manufacturing business or owns fruit fields. She’s unemployed herself, after collapsing a lung pushing a garbage cart through a home for the aged. Yes, this 98-pounder man-handled an enormous plastic bin to the point where she punctured her own right lung. The girl has a heart the size of the moon.
Level 10: MP Cost: 21, Duration: 100 seconds.
So get ready to face your fears—or maybe find your next adventure—with our list of the world’s most petrifying bridges.
We noticed that one review on the memo boards from Ballard said that the burlap was wrapped around MDF which made it really hard to tack anything onto the board, and also made the board pretty heavy. So, instead of MDF, Katie used this insulation product (recommended by the guys at Home Depot):
So you want to see our "cute" house?
Until next time..............Hugs,
were burned
White Sesame seeds - 3 tbsp
Though the structure is indeed stunning, 5046 South Greenwood means a lot more to Barack Obama than just grand architecture.
One or the other. Get them all on record right now. Forget about demagoging old folks or “the children”. Just reduce it to: “do you think it’s ok to borrow 42% of your expenditures?”
I always love to look at garden inspiration for the weekend. I suppose I am trying to entice myself to get out there and do some gardening...and these pics do just that...
This poem prompt was inspired by reading poetry (!) and this wonderful piece by Chito L. Aguilar (www.shiftingshades.wordpress.com):
*Must follow this weeks theme
By that time, news had started to come in about the 8.2-magnitude earthquake in Indonesia. What I had experienced was a tremor from the major earthquake. My husband – who had felt the quake along with his colleagues – and my parents from Ahmedabad – who had seen the news on TV – called to enquire if I was alright, and soon, cossetted in the comforting warmth of family, the panic of a few minutes before was gone. The panic had been replaced by something else, though – a pang in the heart at memories of the Gujarat earthquake on January 26, 2001.
If you’re like me, you’ve confused sofa for the Tosefta or the Mishnah for the Messiah. But these two writings are part of an important body of Rabbinic literature that form the foundation of the religion of Judaism.
It wasn’t just the men who fancy the gay lifestyle. Several white-collar, married men found themselves busted, and their activity was preserved for eternity on videotape. Men were finding each other on the internet and getting together every Tuesday, under the old railroad bridge located on Loathsome Creek. Total strangers having sex and then bring whatever disease they caught, back home to their families. These men went by names like, Joe Blow, Johnny Suckall, and Jimmy Backside. They didn’t even know each other’s real names. When police came upon the scene to arrest the men, they took off running like scalded, half-naked dogs. Law enforcement had no problem catching them. It’s hard to run with your pants down around your ankles.
Secondly, ‘chance to save this city’? There’s been no shortage of readers, those that still visit the website anyway, who have pointed out that the ‘city’ is in no danger. Hypotenuse, much? There wasn’t all this fuss about Longlevens being transferred to the Tewkesbury constituency, and likewise, I’m pretty sure it continued to be served by Gloucester City Council. IIRC, Churchdown and Brockworth also belong to Tewkesbury. Or maybe Cheltenham? Something that appears to make little sense, but still didn’t inspire a march,anyway.
In March 1999, Central Vermont Public Service and Green Mountain Power proposed a forgotten, similar merger, including divestiture of their generating assets, with publicly traded, shareholder ownership.
Located just off Man O War Cay, Sandy Cay offers an ideal location in the protected Sea of Abaco. Unnoticed by most that pass, the island has been developed very carefully, leaving much of the natural vegetation that provides the utmost privacy.
With my new Bavarian wool and silk hat and some stops for outdoor Gluehwein, we went around this interesting city tasting Schweinshaxe, Knoedeln, Pretzels, Leberkaese, Sauerkraut, Wusts and a lot of other dishes with brown sauces.
I was walking aimlessly looking for a restroom, & a volunteer directed me towards The Bovard Auditorium. Once inside, I saw several were gathering for a panel, the house was not filled, so I decided to take a seat, having no idea who was about to speak. Shortly after, Amber Benson of Buffy the Vampire Slayer fame, took the stage (score!) as moderator to the guest speakers: Sci Fi writer & columnist, John Scalzi, Young Adult writer, Maureen Johnson & TV Writer, Author & Actress, Pamela Ribon (aka–The Pop Culture Princess). The panel was “Nerds Shall Inherit the Earth” & during their time on stage, the 3 discussed their backgrounds & just what it means to be a Nerd; is there a difference from Nerd, Geek & Dork? (Not really, we love ‘em all), Hipster vs. Nerd (Hipsters apparently care more about whats in & who is cool; as to where Nerds don’t give a sh*t) & a great discussion arised with a question from an audience member; how do the ‘true’ Nerds & comic lovers feel about the action heroes being brought to life for all to enjoy by Hollywood? John was very welcoming & thinks its great to get more ‘members’ so to speak, in Nerd land, so the more the merrier, & its great when a film can spark a new interest in people.
The real thing about having NO DSLR
The gruesome crime was still unsolved three years later when the “rear axle murderer” above, Robert Harris confessed. Briefly, The police thought the crime solved. So did the press. “Confession by King of Weird Cult clears up Detroit Murder” read one headline, but it was not to be. Harris didn’t do it.
I made two batches of the Honey Madeleines. The first one, I followed the recipe and made brown butter. You melt 1 1/2 sticks of butter (to make 12 madeleines - it is best to NOT do the math on the butter intake)...and then allow it to boil while stirring. The milk solids get brown and nutty smelling. After a quick strain to remove the big bits, you let it cool off before adding to the dough.
I used my Perfect Layers a few times on this card, creating different sized layers and mats for this fun card....
I’m down to my last final exam (Thursday) and things are finally settling down. This semester was exhausting! This week, I’ll be updating this blog with everything that’s been going on (hopefully I remember them all) so bare with me!
What's just as bad,
Legend of Kyrandia
As we have been forgiven
Purchase the album at thegreatestliar@rocketmail.com
This is what creates the landscape of your next moment in time. This choice you made with complete action to put it into an energy motion (think e=MC2).
This is getting kind of long, huh? I’m still going though.
born 7/8
Ouroussoff continued, "You either walk away from it, or you see if there's something actually you can bring to the project."
things with scarves
Without the death of Thomas and Martha Wayne the world wouldn’t have a Batman. Their horrible death gave us many years of joy as we followed Batman as he beat the crap out of numerous villains, and watched him cruise around in some bad ass vehicles.
I think of the hours I spent rocking him, nursing him, taking him on walks and playing with Hot Wheels and reading dinosaur books and truck books and Richard Scarry books. Laughing with him, pushing him on swings and delighting in each new discovery, each milestone he reached.
Since then various amendments have been made to the 1894 act from time to time. Despite these amendments the administrative procedures have remained same.
So, have you changed your mind?
So they learned how to brush them, and how to maintain the bridles and saddles and other stable things. But because of the rain, they didn’t actually ride the horses until Friday. Can you believe it? If we waited for the rain to stop in Vancouver we’d never do anything! Nevertheless, they had a lot of fun, got really muddy, did some facepainting (of the horses too), played games and finally on Friday, got up on a horse! Nicky fell in love with Quechilla and both him and Danika rode her while I documented this auspicious occasion (Nicky’s first ride).
½ – 1 kilo Green Beans
Going the other direction, something interesting happened. I was having trouble getting him to turn and exaggerated my rein aids with the outside rein on his neck and an opening inside rein. He protested by throwing his head down and bulging further to the outside. Hmm... So I completely ignored my hands on tried only leg aids. Perfect circle. Interesting.
Because of customs, traditions and physical attributes, so different from their neighbors’, the origins of the Coorgs remains a mystery, with no fewer than 17 theories analyzing it.
I Watched a couple of videos on YouTube. I guess I was tired as I fell asleep watching one, lol.
Director: Martin Campbell
and it made explaining the Sabbat to them easier.
and a thousand dialects to try—
Helicopter weight: 27g
Starting TODAY, we are inviting our readers to write with us. On Friday each week, you can link your blog to our blog and share your own thoughts on the topic for the week.
Let her see her pure potential
The second day there I got a nap, got another one on the third day, nice. The old Cajuns we knew growing up were right about a lot of things – the importance of the daily nap was one of them.
Next week, after many long decades, the spot where Willie Earle was murdered will be officially and historically marked. Future generations will not be like me, driving by a rural place in the road without knowing whose blood was shed there. We will see, and we will know.
We'll be parking near the Yale Rep at 3pm for as long as the weather permits. Stop by for our Hummingbird, Vanilla, Red Velvet, Chocolate and Vegan cupcakes. Think of them as the blank "canvases" to create your own edible works of art. You'll need our Vanilla, Cream Cheese, Chocolate and Salted Caramel frostings to make them true masterpieces. Or just be inspired by a taste of one of our own special concoctions, that delish German Chocolate Twist.
They also learn that the Graveminder and Undertaker are historically tied and drawn to each other. He must protect her, and she depends on him to guide her from the land of the dead — which she finds immensely attractive. Is it the destiny of the Graveminder and Undertaker the reason Rebekkah and Bryon have always been attracted to each other? Or is it true love? Or does it even matter? With no time to figure out their feelings for each other, Rebekkah and Byron must work together to figure out who killed Maylene and to deal with the dead — who are now suddenly so restless.
10% off every game.
And so we left Peppers Ruffles Lodge & Spa, waving to three very wet alpacas as we headed towards the large wooden gate that sent us back into the real world.
Dear Jacqueline, we all see you smiling and glowing in the light. May you know that LOVE, the one universal sustaining force, is being sent to you right now and always will be. May you feel it and know that love is without end. You will always be loved and you will always be remembered. Love to you dear one. Peace be with you Jacqueline. Know that we love you, The Prayer Team.
I knew many who were not so fortunate.
... more twine, burlap and journalling ...
Sometimes I stamp and color an image just for practice that I have no intention of using. But then when I'm done, I like it and I want to die cut it but how do I line it up?
There is no populist political party in this country, no one who looks out for the interests of the 'little people.' Both major parties truly represent the wealthiest and most powerful, while using the 'poor suffering Others' as a means of coercing 'love and tolerance' from us.
The Boston area surrounding Fenway Park is a lot more of an appropriate baseball atmosphere then the surrounding areas of Citi Field and Yankee Stadium. Now don’t get me wrong I love the atmosphere for what it is, and I have been going to games for as long as I remember, but there is just something about the way Fenway is constructed, and the surrounding buildings give more a classier look, then a bunch of crummy auto shops.
Philip Strange had been a carnival performer doing a mental act involving hypnotism, and had studied various eastern esoteric philosophies. When the First World War broke he was assigned to G-2, the US Army Air Corps’ intelligence section. He was a fighter ace and a spy-hunter and helped to foil various outlandish German schemes to spread terror and confusion.
I made the earth using sponge daubers.
It’s beautiful. It’s haunting. It’s magical. It is simply one of the greatest albums ever recorded.
If however you do need advice on Investments, Economics, Funding and Liquidity, Interest Rates and Forex and Derivative markets we are happy to help.
Well, certainly nobody in the State-Controlled Media.
- I’ve discovered that I am inspired and most productive when I’m writing about something that’s important to me. Then, the blogs almost write themselves.
Don't believe me?
Not only does he mock the birth of his enemy, but he also refers to himself as superhuman. Or how about this? Or These?? Oh you may laugh now, but in 2012 when the 4 monkey men of the apocalyptic Armageddon are chasing after you, don't come running to me. So fall on your knees now and begged to be saved by the Jeebus!
She cools
"They have given me a Polo as a loan car and have threatened to take it away if I go to the newspapers. Can you please help?"
A slave because I rule thee still;
Don't forget, in the interest of fair play:
The signs and symptoms of stress overload can be almost anything. Stress affects the mind, body, and behavior in many ways, and everyone experiences stress differently.
All great fun, I’m sure, and I’m rather sorry I was not there among the guests. The five commanders selected came from a broader list of twenty drawn up by the museum’s curators. To qualify for inclusion all had to come from the seventeenth century onwards. Michael Collins is a bit of an oddity, in that he was a guerrilla leader who never commanded an army in the field.
"OK," he said as he climbed up on the picnic table about to come in through the window. Man, it was a good thing he was pretty because there wasn't a brain in that boy. Just dust, cobwebs and mounds of clothes.
I honestly tried, i even told him many of times just to leave me alone and that i couldnt cope no more cheating like this.
Following some angry moans here and there, the autocratic decision was accepted and the bus ride preceded smoothly. One did not even have to worry about holding on to the handles; too impossible was the notion of falling in this tight mass. That is probably also why at first nobody noticed when I fainted. Ah, you know, maybe I am a feeble, little light-weight, maybe it was the heat, not haven eaten or repercussions of my regular familial drama, but somewhere between Calle 100 and 106, I must have lost consciousness. All I remember is staring at a woman’s red earring tremble in front of my nose, feeling quite hot and tired and deciding to put my head against a J mate’s shoulder, just for a short minute. Eventually, my state was noticed, and, without much ado, somebody volunteered their seat and a decisive couple of hands pushed me into it. Under the endless stream of breathing advice coming from five worried women around me, the black before my eyes slowly vanished.
“Sorry Reg.” Bertie gave his right paw a quick lick. He got up and padded off a few paces then plopped down on his side like a sack of kittens.
Another detail that often goes unlooked: don’t buy her chocolates. Women love chocolate, yes, but chocolate makes women fat and fat women are no one’s success. If there’s a football analogy for this I’d like to hear it. Otherwise: avoid getting her fat.
One of the pieces of advice the Byron Wycoff media project often shares with anyone who asks is that you can’t be 100% business 100% of the time when you create your online presence. If you are one of the huge players like Walmart, you can dispense with any real interaction aside from handling complaints and updating your sales, but for everyone else, the social element has to be real. Sometimes, you have to lighten things up.
Maybe you say that unposed pose is an awkward expression? I agree with you. The reason why it is a good idea to use it is that is stresses the obvious fact the all photography to a certain extent is posed photography. Already being there as a photographer under a certain sky; in a special location; at a time of day or night you have partly decided/posed the content of the shot. Call it pre-posing. You may not interact with people themselves but you model everything else. And by setting the camera you model that too.
I can't even begin to explain how it makes you feel to see all of this. I am just deeply honored and grateful to these people for all they are doing. It is pure love of country and humanity that motivates these people, and their optimism is contagious. Something special is happening here.
Meanwhile, with all the hysteria about TiVo, and YouTube, and mobile, no other video medium even comes close to live TV. Here are the numbers:
Pedro (David) Grehan, 35, Hoboken, N.J.
In my English world I live in a flat in London. I take the Tube and I don’t own a car. I have a cool business where I can work from home. I live next to a park that is lush and green. I go there to do my serious thinking.
Critically acclaimed author and National Book Award finalist Sara Zarr delivers a heart-wrenching story, told from dual perspectives, about the many roads that can lead us home.
Sunter 2, Jakarta Utara-14330
Planet of Giants
TripleF “It’s a transgender club.”
About a month ago, I went for a walk with my daughter. She never cares how hot it is. She always manages to get me to go. We went in a different direction from our usual walks. She took me to an area right near our house where I had never been. I couldn't believe it! Here was a beautiful landscape area called Lambert Lake. I had never been tempted to go to this area because it's right behind an ugly water treatment facility.
However after a couple of months using Trophy, I can easily say, that it was one of the expenses i deeply regret and if it wasn’t form my laziness i would sell it long time ago. Microsoft os sometimes managed to drive me to despair and to the desire to throw it away.
This is a two week special challenge.
As far as fuel costs are concerned, you shouldn’t pay too much. The EPA’s fueleconomy.gov website estimates $1,800 a year in diesel over 15,000 miles, at an average diesel cost of $4.09 per gallon. However, with most owners achieving comfortably better MPG, you can expect to spend less than this for the equivalent mileage.
I Can Have Money And Freedom, Too…
(And, if you know of anyone who might want to buy a real pretty 2003 Nissan Altima … I’ll make time for ‘em!)
-Become a follower of Busy Hands Busy Minds
Arthur Aughey recently wrote that English nationalism is, as yet, still a mood rather than a movement, but the poll seems to confirm that the mood is being nurtured by an aggressive assertion of Scots’ nationalism north of the border.
This was my card. I made my card 5x5 because 6x6 seemed really big to me. I used striped paper to mimic the stripes on the sketch.
Later when I came to make my commitment to enter the narrow gate, the Holy Spirit made me aware that I had been resisting Him all my adult life, and that I was still resisting Him, explicitly, because I did not wish to relinquish control of my life to Him. However, when I made my commitment to follow Jesus at a Life in the Spirit Seminar, I did it as part of the process of receiving the Baptism in the Holy Spirit, and as the Spirit overtly manifested Himself to me during the seminar all my resistance broke down and I gave my self totally to Him to lead and guide me along the strait path.
Russell watches from the sidelines...You can tell he thinks we are all crazy! lol
What about that phone call from a long lost friend or relative? Voice recognition - I've got those calls and realized, "I would know that voice anywhere". And have you ever lost your voice to laryngitis? You don't realize how much you need to talk until you can't. My youngest daughter almost lost her voice permanently when her larynx was crushed in a car accident when she was in her teens. Thanks to a skilled physician who spent several hours delicately fusing together those tiny bones, you would never know it now. The real adversity was that she lost her beautiful singing voice, but the voice she acquired is the voice I know and love.
Five words and a question mark that either incite fear or excitement (after all, our favorite subject is ourselves). Some people answer humbly (“I help people” says the life-saving ER doctor). Some over-inflate their importance (“I lead research to find the cure for cancer” says the guy who washes petri dishes). And, some stutter because their answer would be schizophrenic (“By day, I’m a mild-mannered reporter, but in the evenings I’m a superhero” squeaks the mousy guy in the thick glasses).
The all new Power Quest will be back on the road next month. You’ll be able to catch the new Power Quest line up in action at the following shows in October 2009:
By offering a sophisticated atmosphere and high quality products to customers who had been looking for a ‘third place’ to relax in between work and home, Starbucks were able to create visibly satisfied advocates who spread the word to others.
The outlook of MACHINE GIRL and ROBO-GEISHA director Iguchi, on the other hand, hints at an upstart Peter Jackson; the type of genius filmmaker who can coat the screen with screaming, skinned bodies and still have you rolling with hysterical laughter as he works his demented magic. Toss in a prolific porn background and a very public infatuation with things entering or exiting butts, and it would be a fair assumption that Iguchi is, without a doubt, a truly one-of-a-kind action filmmaker.
In Jubilee, I was really impressed at the way you seemed to be equally comfortable writing with the narrative voice of a child or an adult, male or female, white British or Asian. This is a rare and special skill. I wondered if all the voices came to you, fully rounded as they appear on the page, or if you struggled more with the ones that are not from your own direct experience.
Right finally for today, i need to get something off my chest, now yesterday i talked about the lady downstairs, but today i need to talk about the man who lives on the bottom floor.
He's at the end of the landing and there isn't much natural light there. Having lights on or doors open to let the light in from the windows just made reflection and glare, so these pictures were taken using flash, something I normally avoid with my camera as it's better without. But there we go - come to the blog party on 26th May and you can see Bobby for yourself. And see me too, of course. And each other.
4) installing a dual flushing system
And then if need be a jury of twelve.
What I will remember from the fair is the tractor pull, Nolan's giggle at the pull, and trying to take Nolan to the bathroom. It must have been quite the sight - a 9 month pregnant lady trying to persuade her not quite 2 year old son to use the porta-potty. I didn't fit inside with Nolan so I held the door open with my butt and Nolan peed (yeah him!)
13. Alabama Song -- The Doors
Something both my grandmothers did is something you don’t see today. Both these women were spotless housekeepers. This was the day before plastic wrap. I don’t recall either of my grandmothers having plastic containers. They kept a big supply of “flour sack” dish towels, clean and folded. When we got up from the noon table (the big meal was always mid-day, not evening), all the leftovers were moved, still in their serving bowls, to the kitchen table where they were covered with clean dish towels, awaiting the evening meal. I don’t remember anything being refrigerated for those several hours between meals. The food just sat at room temperature until folks got hungry and helped themselves again.
9. Is there a creator?
Do look at photographs together; Don’t expect the person to recognize everything.
Autonomia and Feminism: A legacy?
Now if the US version starring Tobey Maguire had sequels, the Philippine version had more:
That part of the world is unified in some ways, and it’s concretely different from what’s farther west. It’s really the first west. It features a kind of rawness that you don’t find when you get farther west when it gets emptier. When I’ve written about that, I’ve tried to dig into that in-between-ness.
So today over at CES our lovely Carrie has chosen the theme of SHAPE IT UP! Have to be honest always makes me sigh coz I love my square cards but I do need to try different shapes. I saw this kick stand card tutorial over on the LOTV ideas to inspire blog that Bev did and thought, yep that's the one for me coz it's still quite square LOL! I really like it and you can use all sorts of shapes for the stand! Only thing is that I found it a bit of a nightmare to photo to get a good angel to show the stand but never mind I am sure you get the idea!
Week - 8
Nick Fox
me: lily do you know why we celebrate christmas?
Because I love telling stories! I think fictional stories have incredible power to help us understand the real world in new ways.
Ever since I can remember I've been fascinated by the process of comics: how they're put together. Pencils, inks, colors, lettering, editing, production. Early on I had an ability to notice alterations in artwork. I was a lad of 10 when Kirby moved to DC and Superman and Jimmy Olsen's redrawn faces stuck out like a sore thumb. Or, at Marvel, Romita faces were sometimes on Kirby's women, or a Marie Severin or Herb Trimpe face or figure would show up in a George Tuska or John Buscema story. I was particularly interested in comparing changes that occured in reprint titles such as Marvel Tales or Marvel Collector's Item Classics. I often took out the originals from my brothers collection and discovered that the entire story was often recolored, or there were sometimes changes in copy. Covers were particularly interesting, since the originals were often restructured in some form, either cropped, images flopped or copy added or deleted.
It's a leisurely hour's walk, taking in two smaller islands - Little Eye and Middle Eye (which has a gorgeous little beach, enticingly springy turf and great views.) It takes another hour to have a good look around Hilbre.
The RMS Titanic
Initially, our nationwide literary competition – Undiscovered Authors – used to act as our in-house agent to source the majority of the works we published as DA Diamonds, and there are plans to revive this scheme in the future, so watch this space!”
As a result of the mobility, I mean this in a figurative and not a literal sense. The ‘house’ is the Church, a group of people, the Body of Christ, the People of God, the Temple of the Holy Spirit. With the BURN, the ‘we’ I’m talking about is not a group of people joined together by a particular building or community, unless that community is Bradford. The ‘Burn Crew’, (as I call them), are a group of like-minded worshippers and intercessors from all sorts of churches and backgrounds, from all over the city. There are even people who so regularly come from Leeds and Liverpool that they are just as much a part of the ‘House’ as the rest of us, too.
The twinkle in your eye is only the sun on your bifocals - Kamal.
I’d like to leave the tree I build at OOTO standing where I build it. Acting as a wildlife feeder, home to insects, birds, and small burrowing animals. Unfortunately it had to be taken down, so I broke off decorated branches and placed them around the tree, ready for the taking. People had already taken pieces away, so it seemed a natural progression. As I worked I received the energy of a nearby Gong Bath.
Me: have you had a poo?
I do not blame the Disney film adaptation, if one can call it that, for ruining my opinion of the novel. I believe if I had read this book 20 years ago I would have loved it. As it stands today I only sort of enjoyed it.
Free Henry! – 9:00 p.m.- Merge
Very beautiful piece. I bought it for my step mother for Xmas and I know she’ll love it but they sent me a box to put it in and the box was way too small it wouldn’t fit
Hupp is referring to Oct. 18, when Thompson’s husband, Terry Thompson, set free 56 animals before committing suicide. Most of the animals were shot by law enforcement, but six were taken to the Columbus Zoo and Aquarium, where they were kept under quarantine until Monday.
Glasgow - Women's 60 meters
Hogan ultimately chooses Joe and Magnus to defend their Tag Team Titles, but who are the challengers? Hogan will decide that, later tonight, we start Impact….now.
The water was within 2” of the top of the bottom gates and we were almost against the bridge roof, well into the arch.
I realized recently that I speak much more frequently about Tevye than I do Saarah. There are a few reasons for this; Saarah doesn’t provide very good fecal stories, her shenanigans aren’t usually as outrageous as Tevye’s, but mostly it’s because, while she may be very expressive and opinionated, she’s only 17 months old and really doesn’t say the same crazy things that Tevye does.
The problem isn’t just our economy. It isn’t just our governmental officials. It isn’t just our foreign policy. It isn’t just this, or just that… The problem is us. Are we going to continue to try to slap band aids on a broken nation, bleeding money and resources, and more importantly, the lives of our military service men and women? Or are we going to address the real issue, and seek the solution that WILL heal?
I’ll never say you won’t be afraid, for in fact, I terrify.
DAILY
INTERIOR: REBEL GROWLER.
Another J.Crew review! I tried on the Jersey Maxiskirt in Stripe right when it came out. I loved the royal blue/navy colorway and the length was perfect for me with flats. I just didn't feel like I had enough to pair it with, so left it there. Well, that and I didn't want to pay FP for it.
6. Postulate the notify of a dr., if the nature of your difficulty is too pressing. If you consider that you love reached a bushel of no repetition. These old counselors bonk unimaginative solutions, in their motion!
These qualities are strengths when used productively, but when they lead to bad choices they become weaknesses. There’s a lot more to Xandra though. She’s got an eye for beauty and a profound sense of her world and the people in it. She’s got a curiosity that refuses her to just let things go, unexamined. She’s got a strong sense of right and wrong, which can lead to a hot temper that gets her in hot water. But deep down, she’s searching for the truth. The truth about who she is, from where she came, and why she exists.
Separate segments introduce each character: There is Ok-nam, a married, 30-something woman with a daughter, who decides to buy a piano for her child by prostituting herself and ends up with an old geezer who just so has to die on her when they have sex; then there is Hye-na, a 17-year old high school student, who has been raped and gives birth in a public toilet, all alone, writhing in pain and eventually flushing the fetus down the toilet; and, finally, Ju-jin, a beautiful opera singer with an angelic voice, who has recently been diagnosed with cancer that can only be cured through the removal of her tongue – a death sentence for her in every aspect.
Amigo Tom... At this time Tom Jobim had spent quite a few years in the US recording with the likes of Frank Sinatra and producer Creed Taylor (for his CPI label). This song is a simple `welcome home', things weren't the same without you, please don't leave again, yes things have changed here but it will all be okay in the end.. The melody line and chordal structure is a worthy homage to the master of bossa nova.
2: Moorland inquisitor(W), Thraben valiant(W), Kruin striker(R)
We were given a demonstration of how the dog works for us – including how to tell us that the alarm clock has gone off….
2. Wearing your hair in a braid and believing that the effect is “bad-ass tree-climbing arrow-shooting hottie” when all most people see is Tomb Raider.
The rally, which has the support of the City of Sydney, will move from Hyde Park North to the Convention Centre at Darling Harbour.
Some men just want to get the poon, strap up the pants and bounce. For some it’s a conquest and I can say from experience as soon as the sex is over, we will LOSE interest. Women you know how you hate when a man makes himself “too available.” It’s the same paradigm, the only value we have for you is external. This just doesn’t stem from guy to guy, we’re built to think this way. Example, I had sex with a woman 30-45mins after meeting her in the bar. Afterwards, I couldn’t even look her in the eye. I didn’t want to talk or even touch her again. It was just all “too easy” to obtain, so mentally I completely disconnected from her all together. Ever wonder why he doesn’t call or text back.. He has no VALUE for you.
Kyla & Amber - We have a number of exciting projects in the works, including one in our own neighbourhood; Fernwood Coffee’s Parsonage Café. The owners are very passionate about their business and the community, and we’re excited to be working with them on improving and expanding this local mainstay.
You can click on Nyootv.com and watch the trailer of ‘Blood Money’. NyooTV provides you a complete theatrical feeling being online. It’s like treasure for viewers having more than 1,70,000 video uploaded. You have to only click and watch and get entertained. A huge collection of full length Bolywood movies, trailers of forthcoming Bollywood movies, TV shows (old and new), music videos (old and new). You can also watch them in high definition for free. Daily updates on Bollywood events and gossips as you check out videos on all Bollywood Events, Bollywood & page 3 Parties, Music Launch, Bollywood trailers. NyooTV’s host of social media features brings together entertainment with social networking sites like Facebook, Twitter and MySpace. Viewers can share their favorite videos with their friends on their Facebook walls and Twitter update. They can invite their friends to join them on Nyootv.com for fun and entertainment as they can choose to like, dislike or share a video with their friends and have loads of entertainment only on NyooTV.com!
Within my soul I feel strange music swell,
Dear Lord.
This particular 'educational institution' had links to terrorism and the most vile extremist ideologies. I very much doubt if any of the 'protesters' would be happy to find a general Christian university in their city, let alone a Christian version of this, terror labs and all. I certainly wouldn't.
There are many external effects that can change a person, “but it is the power of the Creator alone that can change the nature and give a new nature.”[4] Therefore, in conversion there should be some great change in character. Edwards makes several allowances in this principle. Temperaments must be taken into account as each person is more susceptible to various sins. Time after conversion must also be accounted for. Sanctification will be a process.[5]
But I want to tell you a secret. It's worked. Clique wars are stupid and I'm not sorry to be extricating myself. In recent weeks, I've made acquaintance with people who I don't think I would have if I'd kept up where I was before. And I laughed. I laughed and said, "Is it really just that easy?"
The new contract does help assure labor peace with the union. That’s important for elected officials, who get lobbied constantly by union leaders on all kinds of issues.
Here he was in action in the second last effort. What's great to see is this younger athlete developing and learning. His capacity is undeniable and his work ethic through these type of session is become impressive. On days like this with sessions of this nature it is a test of resolve, persistence and willingness to take up the challenge. Being that it was just one part of a very full day of training is what's even more enjoyable. It was also part of a challenging week. It however is just another week in the build up to London.
This linen dress is so pretty and I've seen it pop up on ebay with some regularity. I am wearing an 8 but wish I had bought the 10 for added length. The sleeves button and are cut slim at the closure. It is unlined and 100% linen so I always wear a slip underneath. The elastic panel at the bust and the pleating give this dress structure, making it viable to size up and not sacrifice a tailored look.
we had a rainy tuesday here but it didn't keep us from the library.
The Rank of the respective Flag Officers to be distinguished as follows, viz;
- 400 men of the Filipino 91st Division were massacred
I hope everyone is well and enjoying the bank holiday weekend and hopefully getting lots of time to relax and craft!
Then I thought I know what I can do, ill ring our contacts at Scotland Yard. If anyone’s going to know, it will be them. So I contacted Richard Gilbert at the Met, and to my surprise - another big fat NO!!! So then I thought I’d contact the press contacts I had made in Peterborough over the last few weeks. And guess what, another NO!!
What if you didn't work here? Would I be happier and enjoy my job more?
Luckily for me, the latter turned out to be true. In that one month, I went on dates with three people from the site-Mr. Vittles was the first one I started emailing but the last one I met in person. We connected instantly on our first date. The next day, I called the other two gentlemen and told them while I had enjoyed our dates, I would not be able to see them again.
Cheers~
Oh yes, always ride the “for the ladies” train. At least in there you’re competing with the ladies and there’s no risk of men taking advantage of unavoidable body contact and limited space. One more thing, a man’s push will definitely throw you out of the line. Obviously, they’re more aggressive. If you think these men would be nice to you because you’re a lady, think again. A lot of them don’t give a F- anymore. What matters is they get to ride. Don’t listen to others saying there’s more space in the men’s area. If you forget, it’s the rush hour we’re talking about. It’s overcrowded in any train so stay in the ladies’ area.
- Hand soap liquid 250 – 828 mL $1.99 each (Softsoap)
Row 1- ch1, turn, sc in 9
But the rest of my appliances do not match :(
02 Long Way South
Now we say, "And that's going to be the title of my autobiography."
I wanted to take this time to wish you a Happy Mother's Day. I know it is still a waiting period for you, but that in no way means you are forgotten on this day.
Police believe the slasher is a homeless man who is not unfamiliar to them, but they’ve never managed to get enough evidence to pin him on tire slashing charges.
regardless, thank you sweater for your warmth.
Some of this was achieved, and seeing a character like Anita in a drawing allows the reader to better grasp her size and power, for she most assuredly does not have a typical female form. Seeing the capsule was also illuminating, as were some of the action scenes. My main regret soon became not having more drawings done for each Chapter, but my resources were limited and the artist was hard-pressed due to time-constraints. Book 1 alone consumed 58 drawings spread over fifteen chapters and many more could have been used.
Maybe that's why we go to so many memorable places."
African countries for Africans
Moss said: “Times have changed so much since 1955, the biggest difference between then and now is that Mercedes won every race they entered in 1955, including sports car races, with exception of the Monaco Grand Prix.
“Prove to the people that you are not coward and defend your statement,” he said, pointing out that he has yet to receive any response from Masing.
until I met him in the form of a sock yarn. Alexander, who knows a thing or two about art, was equally ignorant, and my husband, whose knowledge is pretty encyclopaedic, claims only a dim awareness of the name. So we don’t know why Opal has so honoured him. (Van Gogh, yes, I’ve heard of him.) But he’s turning into a good sock.
A reader of Evert Duyckinick’s portrait of Benjamin Franklin may overcome with the tranquility that exudes from the painting. With the first gaze, however, he/she may not be able to discern the source of that tranquility; it exudes from his countenance. Franklin’s slight tilt of an eyebrow seems to portray his wisdom; his relaxed eyelids seem to indicate his benevolent nature; and his evenly-spread, motionless smile sums up his tranquility that comes with distinction – one of the founding fathers of America. Indeed, this visage of Benjamin Franklin is a persona of a wise and benevolent father, and this father imagery relates to, and reinforces the context of The Autobiography; this memoir is contextualized and framed in a “father-son” interrelationship. It is this father-son framing of the context that makes this memoir a paternal inheritance, not only to his biological son, but also to the sons of America. As a father figure, Franklin in The Autobiography tries to inculcate self-improvement, industry, and truthfulness in American youth; however, the fact that the very virtues he advocates stem from his father and the fact that he turns to heavenly father for a higher, moral guidance, implicates that these virtues are best gained by being in tune with paternal providence – both fathers of earth and heaven.
I am glad that I had good friends to have this interesting debate with (thanks Amy, Kathy and Lin!). Everyone has their own beliefs and their slant on religion. I learn so much from other people. I hope to keep an open mind and become a better person.
Next chapter: The school year ends.
I had a cancer scare of my own. It was Benign.
They are now moving contracts from a segregated trading division within the Bank Holding Company which operates under the venerable name "Merrill Lynch" to their retail banking division alongside their customer deposits in order to get these contracts under the umbrella of the FDIC.
If you hadn't kept us home bound for four delicious days, we would have missed the hot chocolate.
“Wait, and then, she told some kid from the warehouse that she loved him. And then, she told Mother Superior she loved her, and….”
This is what we saw....what the hell??!! What is going on underneath that robe! Needless to say, we all had sick minds and found this to be hilarious! I couldn't stop laughing as Scrooge's head kept bobbing back and forth!
Huey piano smith - Little liza jane
1 Puff Pastry sheet (Thawed)
Before the snow melted, life went to shit, Paul had his heart attack and all thoughts of building got put on the back burner. By the time life was normal enough to start salvaging, the construction waste site at the dump had been plowed over.
ribbon - found in a Christmas decoration box (and yes, I took it and ran!)
But today is your birthday so… T_T Ok?
There is a large television blind spot of mine that I like to refer to as The Thick Of It. I’ve heard only fantastic things about the British satire created by Armando Iannucci but I’ve never gotten around to actually watching the series. As there are only sixteen episodes of the show I have no good excuse as to why not. I mention this blind spot simply because HBO’s new comedy Veep is also created by Iannucci and is also an F-word filled satire about the government. Unlike fans of Iannucci’s previous work I’m coming into Veep rather cold. Somebody better versed in Iannucci could tell you whether this is an extension of his old series but all I can offer up is that this feels like a grower.
What more will it take for people to realize that voting for McCain or Obama is throwing your vote away. McCain will lose, and Obama will win. Just prepare yourselves to be disappointed.
And as for my teens, those students who are the most passionate, the most tenacious, the most “heart-minded,” those are the students I typically remember long after they graduate.
"Ah Jesus you'd better go and change your robes we're eating out at the Olive Garden tonight, ya know the last supper before John, Tom, Ringo and Mat go off to college."
That's why it's hotter
CR: If I’d known what was going to happen I would have voted against it. The 11 of us in the Conservative group argued long and hard. One disagreed and abstained, and there was party discipline for that. But at the time I agreed – I voted for it.
That's not all.....
Colours of belts vary slightly between Karate Schools but generally speaking the colours get darker and darker, the darker the belt is, the higher rank the student has achieved. Years ago, instructors are reported to have not washed their belts, the longer the training, the dirtier the belt. Some martial artists still maintain belts should not be washed as the belt is significantly spiritual and it contains the ‘heart and soul’. (This is, needless to say a very personal preference.)
For the title, I cut out the word VIEW with my Cricut machine & then added some of the little letters from the Simple Stories Destinations Kit. I also added a big flourish sticker to the top of the photos which is also from the kit. Then I took the ticket border sticker and trimmed them apart & popped up every other sticker for a little bit of texture.
ARENA mixes white sand, turquoise ocean, blue skies, warm sun and great house music.
Carol Denbow: Sounds like an interesting and “successful” venture. Even with this publishing method, it seems the book is “priced” right on. Can you give our blog visitors the links to your book in all those formats?
But there is something more to be said. The charge of squandering public money is looked upon as a non-casteist charge and by bringing it up, prejudices and animosities which may otherwise have casteist origins can be sanctified and presented in public discourse. What predictably escapes from scrutiny are the plethora of such expenses done over the years and even now in a country as poor as India – the upkeep of Rashtrapati Bhavan ( a 340 room residence – the world’s largest residence for a Head of State) and other Governor Houses, the banquets in the governmental charmed circles, the lavish welcome to foreign heads of state, the “traditions” of the armed forces like musical bands and polo clubs – the list is long and expressing it loudly is tantamount to bringing down the prestige of the nation – indeed the same nation which has the world’s largest number of hungry humans and an infant mortality rate of utter shame.
My heart swells and aches for her.
42 all
After a game,
In solitude she lived,
Perhaps I hear you sneering at those writers (and actors, and director) who dared to make Hop, but shame on you. These people are trying to make a living, so leave them alone. I was in a screenwriting class once, wherein we were asked to explain to the professor (himself a well-respected screenwriter) what movies we had seen over the past week. In this class I was surrounded by film snobs who went out of their way to point out the edgy, fancy, artistically challenging films they’d seen. Me, I typically watched whatever happened to be on basic cable when I was sitting in front of the TV, and one week I had watched Anaconda. When I told my professor this, I could hear the skin tightening on my classmate’s faces as they sneered. My professor, though, said this: ”I know the guy who wrote Anaconda. He’s a good friend of mine.”
Tip: Use a plastic place mat or wax paper to roll out your MM.
The safety of that coffee shop juxtaposed with the danger I was in now.
I spent a week out of state recently. My thoughts were back home and I worried about the drought and the lack of rain. It was 83 degrees where I was. It even rained one day. People there just didn’t get it – even though I tried to explain how intense the sun was, how uncomfortable it was to be out in it. “It’s always hot in Texas, isn’t it?” they asked. I nodded and gave up. I guess I should’ve just said, “This is the time it never rained.” I think about that line as the wind blows without ceasing.
Another frequent question relates to revision and preparation for exams – there is a lot of material out there on “How to revise” I do not intend to go into this again here particularly as everyone studies in a different way. Instead I list the 5 “points” that I consider the most important and explain a little about how I approached my LPC exams.
Then it is on to the Cruden F1 car. This is accurately mapped in Racer Pro; engineers from within F1 have affirmed its accuracy, especially its power delivery. Despite driving in the same position on the same rig, the F1 car feels so different to the Megane car on the simulator. This shows the Cruden set up does fully replicate the vehicle dynamics and driving experience. You’re not simply driving a faster version of the lower formula car model.
Also featured on this program will be Made New Acappella from Louisville, KY.
I was planning on making a whole guide, but honestly, they are so straightforward that I just stopped at one point. Only quest that I recommend you NOT to do is the one with the 5 envelopes. Oh God, if you thought peridots or those papers in Neo City were rare, just wait until you try to get these. In KMST, every Harp drops a peridot because of the high drop rates. Here, it took me at least an hour to get like 2 +_+. And the reward was even more annoying, it’s just a stupid bear doll.
When they did have a listing with potential, the owner always seemed to be in Paris with the only set of keys. Or caught up in messy divorce proceedings pour le moment. Or at the beach with her children until we-don’t-know-when. Or not quite sure that she wanted to rent after all.
There's a long hill leading into downtown Frankfort, and as we bumped along in the school bus en route to the capitol building, two blondes in a red Ferrari convertible zipped up alongside us. The bus listed a bit as every boy on the trip crowded the left side, trying to ogle the blondes, while all of the girls instantly assumed a frosty demeanor. When the boys didn't immediately cease the drooling and staring, I announced, loudly, at Hopkins: "If you don't sit down RIGHT NOW, I will incinerate your physics homework when we get home."
This has been one of the most disappointing events in my lifetime, and there are loads of examples pointing to things most of us have known for decades about this country: the cowardice and failure of people in "public service" to plan for anything beyond their watch; the attentiveness of politicians in an election year contrasted with their unconcern when not up for re-election; the culture lawlessness a citizenry acquires when personal responsibility is zoned out and it's-not-your fault platitudes become the norm; the idiocy of not paying attention to obvious environmental problems in the name of progress...I could, of course, go on.
It was in the twenties here today in Maryland which is quite a difference from the weather this past weekend. But it’s warm inside as I sit under my down throw blanket and toss the tug toy that seems to be our dog’s favorite thing at the moment.
Total: 552.50 each month. (not including debt) This is an estimate is goes up and down a little.
1/2-1 cup honey or sugar, depending on taste (optional)
The essence of parenting is preparing children for adulthood. Parents must therefore protect their kids, feed them, keep them healthy and teach them the skills they will need during their independent adult life. But which skills are those? What do we want our kids to achieve with the skills we teach them anyway?
love you all like a bottle of chilled norton dulce natural wine on a march evening in buenos aires.
Woven into these groups, but possibly with an identity of its own, will be a group comprising the power brokers and agenda-mongers, those who instinctively recognise that this is a system that will work, and is therefore dangerous. Would the Climate Act survive if the government had to justify the costs to the people each year? Such people will find every reason possible for opposing this, but will never declare the real reason.
What is apportionment?
3. In This World
I altered the letters with papers from Magnolia and Signe got to chose which Tildas she wanted added to them. You can tell this little four and a half year old is a wee bit into princesses ha? ;)
The 10 Bloggers I would like to nominate for the Genuine Blogger and the Sunshine Awards are:
Joe
The Guardian’s Hackgate expert Nick Davies has run two excellent pieces this week demonstrating how the sheer size and eclecticism of Murdoch’s Privacy Marauders meant that, in the end, there simply wouldn’t be enough spokespeople, bribe-bungers and Silverleafs to stem the flow of incriminating evidence. This time around, he pinpoints ‘detective’ Jonathan Rees as the man whose activities will embarrass Uncle Roop still further.
RB 1: C. Johnson 34 points (153 yds, 2 rush TD +5 100+ yds, 1 40+ yd TD)
i can't count how many times a day i hear,
The most wonderful inspiration for interior design colors.
Although this Christmas was way different from those in the past. I would have to say--it was really good in so many ways. Hope that yours was too, and that your New Year brings blessings aplenty!
Now... what I got for YOU today...!
So today is/was (depending on when you read this) my birthday. There was no excitement no parties and no liquor just me, my mind and my thoughts. I didn’t want to do celebratory things just because I honestly didn’t feel I had much to celebrate besides life and I thank Jesus daily for that.
I have only a vague grasp of how the nutritional properties of flax seeds benefit the human body. I do know that after bike racing and marathon training, we crave these muffins, and that must mean something. They are stellar recovery food. I always make a double batch.
Since then, more than 1.5 million of these slim, eye-catching volumes have been published in three countries, featuring 130 fiction and nonfiction titles by authors such as Dan Brown, Jonathan Safran Foer, Deepak Chopra, Cormac McCarthy and others. The flipback will debut through Hodder & Stoughton on June 30 in England, beginning with 12 titles.
Aside from his good looks and skills in basketball, Kid Class is an upcoming producer/rap artist with lots of drive and motivation to reach his goals
And lately, we have been talking about divorces….a lot. One of Ryan’s friend’s parents got divorced recently, and the friend has to move out-of-state with one of the parents. This incident has hit my boy….. hard. He has started asking me, often, if his dad and I plan to divorce in the near future. If so, what will happen to him and Sahana!
Few things in the world are as perfect as a properly made Corpse Reviver No. 2. The only down side is that few things haven't been said about it--this libation is one of the darlings of the cocktail community. From its history to the individual ingredients to the ways those ingredients have changed, thus forever altering the landscape of the beverage, almost every iota of information related to the Corpse Reviver No. 2 has been exposed or unearthed. And why not? It is a wondrous libation. With its four main ingredients in equal portions not only is it elegant and refined, but also easy to remember. And while the intricacy of the flavors is a key part of its success, the touch of absinthe is what truly showcases the beauty of restraint that the Corpse 2 symbolizes. That little hint of anise is where balance is found.
Recently I’ve been playing with different outfits revolving around the dress; hopefully I can fond plenty more to style it with. Definitely a great buy!
What is the last book you read?
Then, I had a kid. Who is very verbal.
Incidentally, if I’d been given the task of picking a poem by Yeats for this collection it would have been this:
From now on it’s all plain sailing. Be confident, be creative. Trust yourself and trust your skills. Find someone to learn with and find pleasure in what you’re doing.
However, after a lot of thought (and procrastination) I've decided it's definitely time for me to ramble on to new adventures. I'm officially journeying away from the Gypsea Tree, but the blog will remain here for now. Who knows? Maybe one of these days I will stop back here again...
The pattern seems to have been drawn up by Deb King and they call it "Deb's Not Quite Telling the Truth."
2. Our hearts are evil
Drivel begets drivel, to your pen and paper doom
* Entry must be able to be replicated on our system (i.e. no decoction or weird ingredient prep). We are capable of step infusion. Single step infusion preferred.
Of his limbs, his eyes reddening under
30 ? (but what I’d like to pull off is a response to Craig Pleasants’ gallery exhibition)
It should be pretty simple. A BT serial module, a servo, and a button. Pretty simple, right? For some reason I can’t get it working, (It being the whole thing).
Coming up next, Ric Flair Vs Sting.
And I’ll go in the back and have another Disney Princess orgy
Ranger ~ Tim Holtz Vintage Photo Distress Ink
C.S. Lewis once said that we are tired because there is such a thing as sleep, hungry because there is such a thing as food, lonely because there is such a thing as a friend. I take awed and humbled comfort in applying this reasoning to my own inarticulable yearning. And I guess, with this post, I just hope to pay that quiet wonder forward.
Vanilla Glaze: Mix 1 1/2 cups confectioners' sugar, 2 tablespoons water and 1/2 teaspoon vanilla in medium bowl until smooth. If necessary, stir in 1 to 3 additional teaspoons water until glaze is of desired consistency. Drizzle over cooled cake. Let stand until glaze is set.
Realizing this life that you’re learning
Hoping you’d turn and see the love in my eyes
I arranged for the technician to check in with the coffee shop in my building to be let in. So long as he made it before 4:30 PM this would work. After that no dice. At least most of the ridiculous appointment waiting period was covered.
Florida Gulf Coast University is introducing a new program (2009) in the Whitaker Center for Science, Technology, Engineering and Mathematics on Sustainability in Education: Interdisciplinary studies to focus on water, energy and civic engagement , ethics, consumer communications, case studies to encourage lifelong learning and critical thinking … Partnering with Florida Solar Energy Center, University Central Florida for solar technology study and public problem solving … Four- semester course series: 1) World views and water .. 2) Energy /Shelter .. 3) Food/Agriculture … 4)Waste, Health, and Pathways to Sustainability. Lectures, small group meetings, field trips.
However, and as always, there is also the downside of an impressive and beautiful city. The poverty living next to the absolute richness has never been so clear and shocking to me. Maybe this is something you tend to recognise when you're getting older but I was often experiencing a really bitter smack while I was about to take some drinks with my parents at the roofbar of the city's most famous hotel (or alternatively having some super nice dinner at beautiful places) after passing several homeless people who waited near to the flat. And let me tell you that I'm not talking about three.. no, possibly ten or even more. The guilt that you feel is not pleasant at all and it all of a sudden hits you with the facts of reality. Where there is unbelievable richness and beauty, there will always be the opposite to it. Unfortunately, I was not able to visit another city (Saint Petersburg is something I'm absolutely wanting to see one day) but for the first, Moscow was rich enough in all its facets and differences.
I am so excited to have a lot of new readers, so I thought I would take you all on a little tour of our home. So far, I have shown you most of the rooms in our house, but I'm holding out on showing you our third floor (playroom and guest room) because I still need to finish up some projects up there. It won't be long.
So come on Mr.J! I lay down the gauntlet! Can you beat this bargain? Can you still lay claim to being the best hunter of bargains? The best Hurley tight-wad? I have usurped your crown! The challenge is open!
ECO Canada estimates there will be 100,000 environmental job vacancies over the next decade due to retirement. “The environmental sector is growing at a very rapid rate,” says Kevin. “It’s growing on average faster than the Canadian economy.”
Just how long travelers are spending in line at customs is difficult to pin down, partly because of how United States Customs and Border Protection tracks wait times. According to the agency, the average waiting time at customs was nearly 21 minutes in the March-to-May quarter of this year, up from 17 minutes in the same quarter in 2009.
If you're anything like me, you've likely added some new "holiday" inspired pieces to your wardrobe in the past month. It's just too hard to pass up glitter and sequins when you're in a festive mood! But, *sigh* the holidays are over and now you're left with a cute top/ pant/dress/belt/piece of jewelry that you're afraid may never make another appearance until next December...what to do?!
The emails do not really show anything that is not already known. They merely confirm that scientists have become political activists with science a long placed second.
Meyer Hirsch - Sax (7 & 8)
The arriving sun to my neighbourhood came as an advantage to my part, as a means to come across several people to say hello to whilst walking back from the bus stop to my house that are in no hurry, once again meeting a neighbour I could not recall seeing before except on one occasion whilst visiting a church she attended.
I don't know why it happens, but whenever I start getting all 'charged up' I know it's time to head to the needle person.
Good times….I always love it when my parents or friends come to visit. It will be nice when I move into my new place, though, and have an extra bedroom and more space!
recording contract, an SUV Jeep
Wish I could cuddle up near you, my heart break when I think of that
After the recordings of the third album Stephan moved to Stockholm and Magnus to Karlstad and after a while even Patrik moved to Stockholm and the band that used to rehearse for days suddenly had a problem to get together. The last recording to the compilation album En samling Rock från Sundsvall 1985 shows a band that had lost direction and focus. When a tour was booked in April 1985 Anders suddenly said no. He refused to go on tour unrehearsed and the tour was cancelled. Vacum made their last gig in June 1985. One of their best gigs ever.
So, this past Saturday after our morning sessions, VP Rob Cupp told us to pack a bag for the weekend: 3 sets of clothes, shoes that could get dirty, a poncho, and sunscreen. Sounds like a nice weekend in the mountains with God and the KBM crew, right? Right? WRONG.
Mash the almond paste with the back of a spoon to break it apart and get out the lumps (see note above). Mix in the two egg whites and set aside.
Have a great Tuesday!
I've said for a long, long, long time that my favorite thing about living in North Florida is all the beautiful flowers that we get. My mom came to visit two weekends ago and we had the opportunity to go to Maclay Gardens, a state park consisting of native to N. Fla gardens and a summer home donated to the state by the Maclay family in the 40's-50's. It was beautiful! So many colorful Camellias, Azaleas, pretty trees, live oaks with Spanish moss and awesome vintage decor (inside the house). We spent about 2-3 hours there walking around and taking it all in.
As I read about Joseph’s brothers coming to him to buy food, I saw so many similarities between the interaction of Joseph’s brothers with him, and our typical human interactions with God.
We are back! How was your Thanksgiving? Did you stuff yourselves beyond consciousness?
Weird combination of high and low tech in my house this week. I needed a reverb pedal for my guitar rig. "Reverb" for those who don't know is the sound a room makes when sound bounces around in it. You get it naturally when you crank a big amp in a big room, or you can fake it various ways like with a digital pedal or springs inside the amplifier. The spring reverb is pretty subtle, but the digital stuff can get pretty extreme. I've owned a half-dozen of the pedals, but never found one that I really loved. I sold the last one a few weeks ago.
4cups Water
My youngest daughter who has a great blog http://what-vanessa-does.blogspot.com/ asked me when was I going to start blogging again? I replied that I had run out of things to talk about.....or had I? Am I just being lazy?
Heat oil over high heat in a wok until very hot. Add the garlic and stir-fry until golden, about 10 seconds. Add the egg and cook, stirring, until scrambled, about 30 seconds. Add shrimp and stir-fry until they curl and turn pink, about 2 minutes.
And what you see will be...
The Picture Keeper website is chock-full of help if you need it. There's a video showing how it works. There's a FAQ if you get stuck somewhere and need help (for example, Windows 7 is set not to auto-run by default - but they'll show you how to fix that). They even have instant online chat support if you need it.
So back at the Slutensuite Courtney explained she felt bad about being a huge bitch to everyone on the show, in America, probably in Santa Monica and Scottsdale too. Ben was immediately like “oh, totally, I mean I’m sorry for even asking” and I wanted to save homeboy from her. I mean, the thing is, there’s no way around it. When a guy wants a girl to be the one, he will do everything the make her the one, even if the one talks like a baby all the time and hates humans. I feel for Ben. He’s been seduced and in the end, he didn’t want to ruin the Slutensuite, which was the point of the whole thing from the get go.
That's when his panic set in.
“Seeing that the Kuala Lumpur City Hall (DBKL) has denied the permission for Bersih 3.0 to have its gathering at Dataran Merdeka, therefore the respondents and the members of the public are prohibited from being or taking part in any gathering in these areas beginning tomorrow until May 1,” said Mohmad in a press conference at the Kuala Lumpur Police Contingent headquarters today.
* 2 tablespoons pine nuts, toasted
This re-meeting also reminded me of other long friendships I've maintained over the years - the ones that just pick up where you leave them, like a good dog-eared book that you've read over and over again, always discovering something new when you pick it up again. Isn't that what friendship is all about?
I even considered posting nothing but some cute pictures of my pets but I figured maybe you guys won't be as gaga at their cuteness as their biased owner is - so what to do?
06/30
We will be hosting live music again...will let you know soon who will be tickling our fancy with toe tapping rhythms.
A few days ago, the Supreme Court issues a bombshell decision. Corporations, interpreted as ‘persons,’ will now be allowed to spend unlimited amounts on political campaigns, due to an interpretation of the protections of free-speech under the First Amendment as applying to corporate political speech. The implications for our country are profound. We do not live in a democracy by any means – we live in a corporatocracy. And that is BEFORE this ruling. Once this ruling goes into effect, there will be no limit to the extent to which politicians can literally be bought and sold legally. Whatever meagre protections we currently have will soon be swept off the books. The New York Times described the situation in the following terms:
For this week's blog post I am going to share my recent buying for Moving Designz Home & Cottage. Normally every January I go to Toronto for the both the furniture and giftware shows. However this year I decided to do switch things up a bit and go to Las Vegas. After doing some planning and research I chose to attend The Las Vegas Market.
Name: Raphael Boucher
TL: Yes. Not so much the wondering as the restlessness. Sometimes when I read an old story of mine I begin to believe that it's autobiographical - the words fit, even if they don't fit the historical truth. So it's finished. With poetry the feeling of not wanting to change a text usually comes from a more aesthetic source. The analogy I've used in the past is cricket. If the fielders are well positioned, the ball won't escape to the boundary. The fielders are words - they can be quite sparse, but they can contain the batsman if they understand him. Move a word and the poem leaks.
"I think the first thing we would do is go to the Third World countries and teach the women how to grow big hair and give the men Rick Perry wigs," he says. "I will keep us out of war with Oklahoma. And one of the first countries we'll open free trade with is Cuba. We will be opening cigar stores all over Texas. We're not supporting their economy; we're burning their fields."
Paradise's history changed for ever. People who had moved to this town, and this lake for fishing and recreation pulled stakes and left. Restaurants closed. Businesses dried up. Real estate offices shut their doors. Schools consolidated and laid off personnel.
Send a photograph (or two) of one of your creations to Mistress MJ (email address is in my Blogger Profile.)
When I was pregnant I made Andy promise we would never use cloth diapers. I had always thought they were, well, icky. But now after using several hundred disposable diapers, and a good chunk of cash on them, we are trying out cloth.
4-Walking on water
You have been hiding so long,endlessly drifting in the sea of my love.
This masterpiece is my wedding gift from H. I always secretly hoped she would bequeath Younger Dad and I an original canvas to mark our nuptials. And I wasn't disappointed. On the day before our wedding H arrived in her car and unloaded a very large and beautifully wrapped square shape.
and its omnipresent Facebook page were completely out of sight. I had almost
I started dating my neighbour who was czechoslovakian. We argued a lot quite quickly in the relationship and we soon broke up.... that's when I met Steven Rhodes.
Stars fade away when the nights are drowning in the fire-ball lights
If I can’t talk about sex, you can’t talk about God. It’s that simple. Or, perhaps we do it the other way. If you CAN talk about God, then I can talk about sex. So I am starting my own lighting company.
I wish I had the stamina or clarity to write every day, because there have been many cool things that have happened since last I posted. I'm just undisciplined, period. I had a little time this morning and this is what is on my mind. Again... so sorry!
After a lengthy discussion about passports, I reminded him he needed a visa.
They also reported Prime Minister David Cameron’s warning to the world that we live in dangerous economic times.
The competition closes on 17 April 2012 at midnight British Summer Time.
What's more one can use a very small space effectively for us, wildlife and the planet: Hart's pioneering approach worked in just one eighth of an acre – a very small garden. This seems to me to be a wise way to go; and if the deep green views are correct, it may be that our survival as a species might depend on small groups of people buying up land for the forest garden method of local production, with its returns to the eco-sphere as well as to the human.
Sooyoung Park - guitars, vocals
Thank you so much for stopping by my blog. Your support, encouragement, and kind comments mean so much to me!! Now on to your next stop: Mandi’s Blog
Dave Perkes from Peace of Angkor Tours was also in Phnom Penh earlier this week and was headed back to Siem Reap on Tuesday, so he offered to give me — and the four Try brothers — a lift to Siem Reap. More traffic on that road than ever before, which slows down a trip that had been faster after the highway was resurfaced a few years ago. Oh well, it’s still a scenic drive.
Also, as the title states, the most important part of this post is to tell you all of my new discovery....Battle Royale! Yesterday (while procrastinating on studying for my chemistry exam), I came across a video comparing The Hunger Games and Battle Royale and I was very intrigued to see just what types of similarities could get certain people to cry foul that Suzanne Collins had stolen her ideas from another source. And I was instantly hooked when I read the premise for BR.
Carly went to the kitchen’s computer to watch the whole thing, where Spencer’s bread is just about done… being burned to ashes.
If the flavors aren't enough to motivate you to go chase these guys down every weekend, then their philanthropy hook should - 100% of the profits go to helping marginalized communities around the globe. Each flavor of ice cream is named after political movements around the world. That's right. They're the ice cream men that care. I'm not 100% on how all the distributions of funds works, but I like to think that because I ordered their Lebanese flavor that somehow I was helping the people in the old country.
24 hours in a day, 24 beers in a case. Coincidence? I think not.
All of this ought to have made me walk away completely. I have the perfect excuse in my son failing to take up the interest I tried to force upon him. Yet, I still love football. I love the wealth of football writing that has grown up in recent years, typified by the excellent Blizzard quarterly, I love the football community on Twitter and to talk football with my dad, my brother and my mates, I still follow Forest with a childish passion even when I don’t attend games and increasingly I love the atmosphere, camaraderie and good, competitive football of the non-league.
FEMINISM:
Skating around the truth who I am
4. Tell us some more about your zombie love. Any other books or films you’d recommend?
Andy Sachs: Well, I’m a six…
3. Even Hulk cannot lift Thor’s Hammer, but he can do a Spongebob/Tom&Jerry/Looney Tune beating to the god Loki. Ansaya nung sound of pain ni Loki after that scene. ummmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmm.
My lack of a smart phone got to be pretty pathetic – I get lost really easily having no internal sense of direction, and I’m no repository for facts, so I have to google a lot of stuff. Eventually I got a Blackberry Curve – but that too got phased out by advancements quickly enough to the point where my blackberry also was a sign of my caveman-like inability to keep up with technology. Not to mention that I busted the screen by accident to the point where there was an actual HOLE where rocks and dust could get stuck on the inside, between the plastic and the monitor. And yet, honestly, the only reason I ever gave up my blackberry was because it literally just stopped working one day.
44. Sweet or unsweet??
What I'm referring to here is the blase attitude many have toward marriage these days. Get married, get divorced 72 days later because of irreconcilable differences...Kim K - I'm looking at you.
“Night’s candles are burnt out, and jocund day
“Nice for both of you to meet each other?”, I’d almost forgotten Dada was standing beside before he spoke again.”So, Kritika, You coming tomorrow right?”
Thank you all for clicking that little button and agreeing to stalk me.
Quite a line-up, really, since all are very bright “stars.” Castor, while bright, is the dimmest of the six. It is magnitude 1.56 and the convention is to say that first magnitude runs from magnitude .5 to magnitude 1.5. So Castor misses first magnitude by hair where the others are either first magnitude or zero!
Do you remember the ticking clock...that drive and desire to want a bub, to be a parent? Did you put the brakes on it or throw yourself in head first? Did it happen fast or were you tested a little?
Director, N.S.M. Region 11/N.S.M.-AZ Media Spokesman
The goal of the occupation is to preserve order in occupied territories, but Joppolo brings something else to it – in his case an American desire to show that a free government is possible without it degenerating into a tyranny of the few powerful over the many weak. He has a missionary’s zeal to bring the happiness of peace to a town that could easily degenerate into brute chaos and civil violence as scores are settled, former leaders are brought low, and unsettled conditions between regimes make rioting and false famines excellent opportunities for getting rich quick. Joppolo is determined to bring back the gentler ways of civil life after years of war.
begin to acknowledge the drain on his sang-froid
Have you ever thought about what kind of damage I could do if I was given unlimited access to Soledad Miranda's buttery stems for a week and a half? No, I haven't, and you wanna know why? Because no-one cares, you sniveling little pervert! Well, the first thing I would do is sheath them in the daintiest pair of black stockings money can buy (in fact, I want them to be so dainty, that you'll need a magnifying glass just to be able to fully comprehend the amount of craftmenship that went into making them so fucking dainty), then I would take my tongue–while it was still attached to the inside part of my mouth (don't worry, I'm not one of those weirdos who walks around with their tongue on the end of a skewer)–and proceed to slather her nylon-encased...Hey, man, didn't you hear me? I thought I said no-one cares? Oh, right. Yeah, I heard what you said, and, as you can clearly see, I've chosen to ignore you. Besides, everyone is dying to know what I would do to Soledad Miranda's legs if I was given leg-based carte blanche, so why don't you go urinate in a place that is far away from where I currently reside? In case you haven't figured it out yet, it's that time of year again when the mind-altering gorgeousness of Soledad Miranda (Eugénie de Sade) is placed in front of me, and, like clockwork, I'm quickly reduced to a blithering mound of heterosexual ineptitude. Every time I sit down to watch a Jess Franco film, I think to myself: Why can't every movie be directed by Jess Franco and have Soledad Miranda and/or Lina Romay as its leading lady? Seriously, why do other movies even bother to exist? If you think about it, the Jess Franco aesthetic is the epitome of cinematic perfection, as each film contains all the elements necessary to provide my body with the nourishment it needs to sustain an unhealthy lifestyle. Sure, there were instances when The Devil Came from Akasava, a film where British people speak German fluently, left me feeling a tad sluggish, but for the most part the kooky spy thriller checked most of the stylistic boxes I wanted it to check.
Soon after Gerson tried contacting his lost love. He called her, she stared at her phone and then finally answered.
44. The MBEs - Birthday Boy
Geek The Girl (1995)
Ethiopia, he added, had “the necessary resources to build whatever infrastructure and dams it wants on the Nile water. The way forward is not for Egypt to try and stop the unstoppable.”
Anyway, I got someone else to ring her back because she wasn’t happy with my explanation of the problem. And she was nice as pie to the other girl on the phone! And she told her “You should really watch Laura, you need to have a talk with her and tell her not to say such silly things over the phone”!!
I agree with the core of this paragraph in that local churches can easily let politics take center stage and our true focus gets lost. But even here I see an interesting contrast to the first paragraph. In the first paragraph, Noble wants to address the real-life questions people are asking instead of bunkering down into our theological foxholes. But when it comes to politics, we are to make sure our involvement is not taking precedence over the Gospel. I wish he’d said this on point number one so that we could see more clearly that it is the Gospel which is at the heart of dealing with all the every day issues we face in our lives.
What we are after and what I am blogging about is authenticity; pure and simple.
The one thing I wanted to point out is that I feel this show has a message that we all need to take to heart in this day and age. It seems like so many people are despairing and turning into anti-Spiralesque people whereas the only way to overcome our troubles is to rise up and use our innate abilities to fight our problems and only then will we overcome them.
We've had a number of health issues in our home - mostly the normal childhood illnesses. Danielle was a very healthy baby and toddler. She didn't even get a cold until after she was a year old. As a preschooler, she dealt with a few bouts of Reactive Airway Disease Syndrome and now as a teen has occasional sinus trouble, but over all is fairly healthy. Emily was just the opposite. Her food allergies and asthma brought us quite a few sleepless, worried nights. She also gave us a scare with an inconclusive Cystic Fibrosis test that lead to more tests which neither confirmed nor ruled out CF. That was nearly 10 years ago and since she's never exhibited any symptoms other than the ones that prompted the test in the first place, we've all but forgotten about the abnormal test results. Derek's respiration trouble as a toddler/preschooler likely stemmed from the RSV he contracted at two months. He has a few other issues, but I'm going to touch more on that in another post. Last is my Anna, who like Danielle, is a pretty healthy kid. We did have one big scare with her too - back when she was still nestled in my womb. Because I was the ripe old age of 35, my OB deemed me an "older expectant mother" and sent me to the hospital for a special ultrasound that she couldn't do in her office. The radiologist first pointed out that my baby was a girl, and then told us that he found a cyst in her brain. I think that I was supposed to be afraid at that point, but I simply refused to believe that there was anything wrong with my baby. Not even when he mentioned the scary term "Trisomy 18" and gave us a very brief description of what that was. Then he zoomed in on her little hand - which was stretched open - and explained that children with Trisomy 18 do the opposite. They clench their hands. That was all I needed. I refused the ammio for personal reasons and instead opted to go back for another ultra sound several weeks later. By then the cyst had disappeared.
Sherry Shepherd kicked it off with a dark tango that lacked emotion. She was going for intense and brooding, but she just looked bored. I think she was surprised to hear that… it will beinteresting to see how well she takes real criticism. Straight 7′s across the board.
And my contact lens giveaway closed! I'm sorrrry, I am suppose to post the results today! But I got something on and couldn't sort out the names yet! Give me one more day! ^_^
After I finished all of the coats and they were all dry, I covered the areas I painted with mod podge. This was just so the paint wouldn't chip off as easily because it's painted on plastic.
— It is also possible to destroy a M-Com station by inflicting damage with explosives, you will notice that each station has a health bar.
Bosley Hair Restoration
Just another Friday night in the MNT household.
Then I made bacon honey maple caramels for Duane. He and I got to bickering and I forgot I had the pan on the stove. The sugar scorched the bottom of the pain and I thought it was ruined. I tasted a bit of it on a spoon and it was ok, just looked funny. So I carried on. Duane says he likes it and that's all that matters. I'll have to make another pan next week while I'm sleeping or something.
And, when you are first starting out, you may want to purchase a few different styles just to see what is popular and in demand. It is important to have enough materials to create your collection or jewelry line. You are going to need to have different styles and mostly different sizes. One of my biggest mistakes in selling jewelry was not having a large variety of sizes. I purchased a few hundred bangles once and they were all the same size. Therefore, only a small portion of my customers were able to fit the bangles. I learned a valuable lesson. Always have variety and always have enough bangles.
But what had to be the funniest thing about Louie was his thick Brooklyn accent. Louie had the thickest, deepest, Brooklyn accent you have ever heard. It was just so “Brooklyn” that it even amused us, a bunch of Brooklyn boys ourselves.
What wealth the show to me had brought:
“Melissa.”
- is that enough?
Then there’s also the fact that money and cleaning are the two biggest problems in any flatting relationship (just like in most marriages, hah!). I’ve had stingy flatmates who will try anything to squirm out of paying their fair share, and flatmates that were so grossly dirty even by my relaxed standards that I was tempted to tell them to move to a pigsty.
"'If someone’s so smart, they’d figure how to get better-looking. You could lose weight, get plastic surgery, even get your face scraped and your teeth bleached... My dad’s a network news guy. He says people shouldn’t have to look at ugly people.'" (p5).
Just take a look at these pictures.
If you are a professional tradesman or a woodworker and need power tools to earn your living, it is a good idea to invest money in good tools that are going to last a lifetime. Buying knock- off products that are cheap may ultimately prove expensive. Here are tips on how to choose the right professional power tools.
For every four shelves of pink, there was one rather pitiful shelf of blues and browns, for the boys. I may be exaggerating a tiny bit, and there may have been red polka dotted dresses somewhere, but they were all pinked out. My son, I am confident, has not worn pink more than twice so far. When he was a baby, he was without exception taken for a girl, and we were advised that dressing him in pink would be equivalent to making him wear a sequined headband that spelled out GIRL in glittery capitals. Not that we found anything pink suitable for a boy. As the parent of a boy, I thought it unfair that girls had monopoly over pink. Orenstein, the mother of a girl, laments that girlhood has become entirely monochromatic.
Pearl Pen in Dark Brown
Even now, I carry what I got from the application process: the ability to think on my feet, to stand up for what I think is right even if everyone is saying the opposite, to push myself to explore my limits, to be a leader, to know my strengths and talents but know when to be humble about it, to take responsibilty for my own actions, to learn to work as a team… the list goes on.
“I don’t know what causes these so-called switches that happen either, but I think maybe I’m just crazy. I think I could stop it. I just don’t think I’m DID. I think I must’ve made it all up for some freakish reason which I have no idea why, and….well…I’m sorry I’ve wasted your time.”
–focused on designing game to look at the gameplay, and not UI
5. The manager with easiest job out of the above four is Robin Ventura of the White Sox. This is the only spot I agree with from Gonzalez’s rankings. Although my version of the reason is much simpler than others. The White Sox are a god awful team. They have no chance to succeed in the AL Central, and before they can get a guy to lead their players, they need players. Simple as that. They just don’t have players.
I made out for the next village by foot. Then the next, crossed a valley and the river that runs through it and finally came to the little village of Chambray. And here I found the local bar was indeed open, on a Monday and yes they had milk. From memory it was a 4 hour round trip by foot, but hardly a burden enjoying all the sights along the way. Lucky for me Sharon's eldest son miraculously turned up on pushbike just as I was entering the village so I had a handy interpreter to champion my cause. Thanks #1 son.
So, I had to try typing '2012' about six times. I kept typing 2013... is that some sort of sign? Maybe? Whatever. After a few months of being a very irresponsible blogger I have my April faves.
Supplies not listed above:
As I noticed it was now.
I love the pure magical escapism of it. You arrive in a place that a Castle, pirates, haunted mansions and flying elephants exist that allow to escape reality and enter fantasy. The feeling of happiness inside make you feel like a kid again at any age. It makes me feel happy inside, this magical place where you can get excited to take your picture with Mickey.
This is one of the first pictures that I took at the Minnesota Arboretum. When I first starting taking pictures with the Olympus c725.
M: How important are lyrics to you? They’re not listed in liner notes and the vocals are rather low in the mix.
The crowds, sometimes as big as 100,000 or more, had carefully kept to agreed-upon meeting-places and routes, even making a point of thanking police who stood guard in vast numbers, but did not interfere.
Seek this out, and then come back and tell me how you feel about it.
I was the princess that my prince was cooking a meal for.
WKU will dedicate Music Rehearsal Hall at 2 p.m. Friday (May 4).
“Rachel” is a woman I have known for at least 10 years. I first met her at the store when our children were little. Every few years I bump into her on shopping trips. Well currently our sons are on the same soccer team, and we see each other every week. The Lord is letting me know that it is past time to witness to her.
6 because
These are the things I’m doing:
All these come together at Flair Towers, located at the center of the metropolis, in the Ortigas-Mandaluyong area. It’s the new address for those with a knack for knowing the best things in life.
See, she’s always assumed she’d marry some everday, average guy – maybe an accountant. He’d be some guy whose biggest risk might be mowing the lawn on weekends. And it’s because she figures, although she fell in love with Cowboy when he rescued her from a hostage situation in MakeBelievakia 7 months ago, she’s too ordinary for him.
#5
Have a great one!
On the knitting front, we are getting ready for New Years and to add our new puppy to the fun I knitted him a bowtie! I had this one ball of black Alpaca yarn which I have not been able to use because it is not enough to really make much so it was perfect for this little project and I could probably make a dozen more since it takes so little yarn.
‘cheaper gas for everyone’ ‘Fancy or overeager sheep.’
It's a sad day for liquor.
The Ghost of Harrenhal gave viewers the first major death of season two, while setting up the second half of the season, the episode only keeps you guessing as to what might happen next. Every TV show attempts to do this, but Game of Thrones does it best.
Clay Robinson’s final thought is instructive, and brings us full circle, back to the beginning: “Regardless of the package, the beer that it carries has to be good.”
In 1976 Philip Rahman met Wandrei at a convention and the two became friends. Three years after Wandrei’s death in 1987, Rahman and his mostly silent partner Dennis Weiler founded the publishing firm of Fedogan and Bremer to issue work by Donald and Howard Wandrei as well as other classic pulp writers.
Yet, part of me cringes. It loathes the ease at which many hopeful writers slap up what I can only kindly coin…garbage. One dimensional slop. Emotionless and cold as a rotting, dead fish and every bit as nauseating.
I did wake up with some neck pain today, but who can say for sure that’s attributable to the somersault?
DONE! I was done! I reached my breaking point!
In other news, stay tuned for an update on Buttercup’s progress to take over the world, stay green, and feed more dancing maniacs…
Tattoo: Plastik – Feathers
One thing's for sure, laughing at other people's bizarre outbursts makes your own a little easier to deal with.
This morning, I decided that I was going to start a blog, partly inspired by the inspirational Nick Hornby, whose monthly articles in the not-at-all-religious-don’t-be-fooled-by-the-name ‘Believer’ magazine shall be discussed at length in my first real blog, (this is merely a pre-blog; a blog hors d’oeuvre, if you will. Or even if you won’t).
Did you know that?
SHHHHHHIIIIIIIIITTTTTTTTT!
But, I digress...back to the "Eskimo f*ck" brew day. My son had previously made a request to brew a "session" beer of some type, because all of our stock on hand is now strong, 7 to 9 % beers. I had recently scored some of the new Wyeast "Yorkshire" ale yeast, so it was a natural to do an ESB. The brew day went real well. We had the garage TV going with the playoffs on it, and drank coffee until everything was settled and the brew kettle's flame was struck. Matt was taking careful note of everything I was doing, and was fastidiously cleaning anything that we were finished with. It's nice to have a brewing apprentice!!! Roxy was there also, lending a hand, as usual.
It is very important that you develop a personal stress management plan, and get to work right away to reduce stress and tension in your life!
Afriforum chairman Ernst Roets said the documentary was launched in protest against Fifa's refusal to a request to remove the"idealisation" of the controversial late ANCYL leader's name from the Fifa website. “AfriForum Youth has now launched a web site and documentary on the farm murders and the unjustifiable veneration which the South African government and Fifa has for Peter Mokaba," Roets said.
Solar activity runs in 11-year cycles, with the current one peaking in 2013, so more violent space weather is on the horizon.
All in all this is a really nice local home-style veggie and vegan restaurant and definitely a place for all veggies in the Croydon area of South London to support!
The BBC lifts the ban they imposed on the song Charlie Brown two-weeks earlier. The BBC had banned the song because of the use of the word “spitball”.
I'm taking the month off from blogging.
After a few days the sales associate called me and told me my ring was ready to be picked up and I was more than happy to go get it. I had the ring back for literally TWO days before the same exact diamond fell out again. So I called and was assured I wouldn't be charged a fee and was told I could bring my ring back in and they would fix it for free.
And the atmosphere on Sunday was fabulous. The moment we opened at 2pm, people arrived en masse and everyone seemed to be smiling and on and on it went. Twenty-six pieces sold, canapes vanished, champagne ran dry (always a sign of an opening above and beyond my imagination. Don't worry, it won't happen again!).
is how a pair of lovers
Making Connections: The learner will use their knowledge about the internet and make the connection that one can explore places in more ways than ever before possible. The learner will also make the connection that Web 2.0 tools especially those with 3D capability allow you experience places as if you were actually there. The learner will make connections with people, places, activities, customs and lifestyles to expand their knowledge of the world outside of their existing location. The learner will be able to plan their dream vacation prior to arrival to get the best experience possible. The learner will connect with other virtual or real travelers via social networking sites to share experiences using text, pictures and video.
Lanterns cover the sky… And red is the main color for the New Year as it is believed to be the color which scares away the evil spirits. Legend goes though that the Chinese word for year: 年, pronounced “nian”, was originally the name of a beast who started to pray on the people on a New Year’s eve. The beast called Nian, was then persuaded by an old man, who later came to be known as an immortal god, to prey on the beasts harmful to the people instead that on the people themselves. Before leaving, the old man also advised the people to decorate their homes with red paper decorations which would scare away Nian. From then on it is said that the Chinese term 过年, read “guo nian”, which means “Celebrate the New Year” derives from the ancient meaning of “Surviving the Nian” as the Chiense term 过, “guo” both translated into “pass-over” and “observe”.
These days, I feel all but dried up.
Heed my warnings, people. Spanx should be worn at your own risk. I’m in recovery now, wearing slacks two sizes too big and a bulky sweater that leaves me shapeless. Ramping up for: Spanx vs. Me, Round 2.
NICHOL KL, LIND A, MARGOLIS KL, et al. The effectiveness of vaccination against influenza in healthy, working adults. N Engl J Med 1995; 333: 889-893.
The carport shares a common wall with our laundry area, and two of our indoor cats have taken to patrolling that wall, shoving laundry products aside to sit on the shelf and listen, occasionally tapping at the wall with their paws.
“We’re going down an unsustainable path,” says Robert Carbaugh, an economist at Central Washington University in Ellensburg, Wash., and coauthor of a 2011 post office study.
My sincere gratitude to you guys for checking out my Sword of the Seven Stars Album. This short post is selfless promotion for another narrated piece that I was finally able to record and upload today. Entitled Cosmic Draft 2: Iron Raven, it contains what could be an alternative story to what is commonly known as the destruction of Sodom and Gomorrah. What if, instead of being “dens of iniquity” they were really cities of love and light who refused to bow down to a pretender god? The god is enraged and orders destruction by a fire god, after taking one of its kind prisoner and subjecting it to torture. With no choice, the being does destroy the dual cities but changes its mind suddenly and reverses its actions. What effect would that have on timelines, our own especially? The sentinel is offered an unusual alliance with a group – among them Lucifer, Satan and Beelzebub – who plan to overthrow the pretender to hasten their redemption.
Three developments were of concern.
For my non Christian clients, of course, I offered to them to replace Jesus with their diety.
What keeps me going through the day are:
These are only two of infinitely many ways to parent, but they illustrate an important point because, at first glance, they are almost diametrically opposing strategies, yet they promise some of the same results, like raising an independent child. And a closer look at these two seemingly very different philosophies will reveal a very important similarity between them, in that the ultimate goal is to raise a "better" child, or even "the best" child. If you follow the rules according to the philosophy, you will get your "wonder child." If your kid doesn't turn out exactly as you planned, you must have done it wrong.
I’m sure some of you have wondered how I got into western writing. I grew up watching Gunsmoke, Paladin, Bonanza, etc. My dad loved westerns. Top this with the fact I enjoy reading about history. I didn’t mind having to read the history textbooks in school, in fact I may have been the only kid that read the whole books. Now that math
Last we made the almond orange tart. Dorie's flakey, good for almost everything crust is perfect for the almond pastry filling. While the oranges were good with the almonds, we all felt that stone fruit would be a better choice for this tart and are waiting for our peaches and nectarines to be ripe so we can make it again.
David is singing a song of praise to God. As we have read through his life, I have seen so many ways that God was at work in bringing David through trials and tribulations. Now David rejoices looking back on how God worked in his life. He was delivered from his enemies, taken out of many waters. God had done amazing things in David’s life.
It's been a busy week and my Nessa pin-up art isn't done yet. I've been carrying it around with me as I play with the kiddos, penciling as I go. It has narrowly avoided splatters of milk, and the embellishments of an eager one-year-old artist.
The the first and last time I went skiing was over two years, on a very special day that I wrote about here. Perhaps it was beginner’s luck, or maybe Cupid’s cherub’s were watching over me to make sure Zach’s proposal plans weren’t interrupted by a trip to the emergency room–either way, my first day of skiing was AWESOME. Rather, I was awesome: I was bold, if not quite fearless, and I remember grinning madly the entire time.
This Venus-Saturn mutual reception can be emotionally difficult for those who are not in a relationship and would like to be as it indicates the beginning of yet another cold winter with no one to keep their toes warm in bed.
Rob Roensch has published short fiction in Slice, HOBART and PANK and elsewhere. He lives with his wife and daughters in Baltimore, Maryland and teaches at Towson University.
When we go upstate these days after Thanksgiving I still bring those orange hats though. We even blow an air horn before we go sledding down the hill in front of our house.
Is Travel Assistant an approved position within the PM’s retinue?
I couldn’t trade you for anything…not even the authority I was to give up.
It's just a sweet, sweet book that continues to charm.
The last 200 hours have witnessed a tumultuous turn of events in the case.
As my conversation revealed the other day, I already knew that.
I use about 4 hours. This was done in a little over two.
Start by answering the following question:
Again, having two brothers, this space is pretty darn important to her.
Parmesan cheese
Pottering home from a certain Hallowe’en party, a friend and I rocked up at the Whitechapel bus stop hoping to get the N253. And there we waited for over an hour . It was 4am. We had no other way home – as impoverished students, a taxi was out of the question. And yes, we were dressed respectively as a cat and the Pink Panther.
But only 1,001 voted in favour of striking – 48.5 per cent.
You can acquire original home decor objects, apparel, pottery and accents that preserve local artist traditions and cultures.
Nature truly put on a great display tonight and I took advantage of it as you can see in my photos.
but you know more or less you should fear me,
3 tablespoons Campari
I don't like 3D movies and I am not sure what the box office figures are for 3D vs. regular movies. In very few instances does the 3D effect add anything to the movie and often it is distracting. In my opinion it is just a way for theater operators to charge higher ticket prices. And charging even more for the 3D glasses proves it. Do they expect that you will pay an $15 to see their 3D movies and then pay another $5
Your subordinates would get frustrated if you end up not being happy with their performance when they had been under the impression they were right on the track or they thought you would be pleased with their output. Thus, it would be unfair for them to get coached on something they thought, all along, was an excellent showing.
Me: Imma about to shove my fingers up your nostrils until I touch the part of your brain that is making you act so retarded and POKE the SHIT out of it. Fair warning.
I need to get Aprils finished
Just watchin' the bubbles in my beer
PS. I'm obsessed with U2:s song "city of blinding lights". It's brilliant. And so beautiful.
If it weren’t for the three of you, I wouldn’t have been molded into who I am today. I am forever grateful and blessed to able to call myself, your daughter.
You were my writer. My poet. Not anymore though.
Wha' sa (What's that)
Alternate: Eric “A-rek” Matthew Dye
Absolvng sins – Pope Benedict XVI exonerates Jewish people for their part in the death of Jesus in his Jesus of Nazareth Part II. Realllyyyyy??
Yo La Tengo+
Place the sesame oil into the pan, along with the broccoli, red pepper, carrots, garlic, and ginger.
“I wish it were as simple as that.” Abby nipped her lip, sniffling. “Zanna’s nowhere to be found. Didn’t sleep in her bed last night, and–and we have no idea where she might’ve gone or . . . why.”
(I didn't bother looking at the price because it was a size 10 and I'm just a size 8).
assume the responsibility for knowing the community standards within your area of access.
Ros (raises his head at Guil) Seventy-six love.
Ehrenhalt shows us how the commercial canyons of lower Manhattan are becoming residential neighborhoods, and how mass transit has revitalized inner-city communities in Chicago and Brooklyn. He explains why car-dominated cities like Phoenix and Charlotte have sought to build twenty-first-century downtowns from scratch, while sprawling postwar suburbs are seeking to attract young people with their own form of urbanized experience.
I am of course delighted that he's back home. I hadn't realised quite how much I had missed being able to chat in the evenings, and to sit with him on the balcony in the mornings drinking coffee, before he set off to work. It's also so helpful that he can now get my shopping for me on his way home from work, to save me struggling on the bus and up the hill with heavy bags.
Remember, you don't need to use Love My Tapes products to participate.
guy: I just need to talk to someone that would help me
When in reality, i have bigger fish to fry right now! And i’m looking alright thank you very much.
Now, at last, I have arrived at almost my perfect space (I won’t call it perfect, nothing is while I can still dream.)
Sent: Tuesday, March 27, 2012 6:42 PM
I take bulling very seriously, but I approach the topic with a level head.
I don’t know what it is about brushing their teeth that sends the kids over the edge, but it does. Every night, without fail, Max suddenly becomes giddy and giggly while brushing his teeth, finding everything hysterically funny. Jack is not amused and gets mad at Max for laughing and slobbering and spitting so close to his face and he starts complaining. This makes Max laugh even more and get in his face even more. Jack starts yelling, “MOMMMMM!! MOOOOOOOMMMMMM!!! MAKE MAX STOP!!!!!!!!!!!!!” Then he runs from Max and Max chases him, bumping into the girls on the way. This makes the girls scream. Maggie will give chase because she never, EVER brushes her teeth right away; it’s her version of Lucy and the pajamas. Maggie will find a different thing to do every night to stall on brushing teeth; it’s quite fascinating, really, all the different things she comes up with. John and I jump in here, one of us separating the boys and the other one herding Maggie back into the bathroom to force her to start brushing her teeth. It is because of the above that I am a huge proponent of staggered teeth brushing, having the children go separately or either the combos of Jack/Maggie and Max/Lucy (these pairings have proved the most effective). I learned this technique back in the 90’s from the parenting strategy song by the Offspring. Ya gotta keep ‘em separated, you see. Once everybody has done some form of passable dental hygiene, we are finally able to move on to the final stage of our bedtime routine, tucking in.
For me, and my Millennial counterparts, what we seek in an employer is what we look for in one of our favorite teachers. Someone who is willing to stay after class and talk to us about where we want to go in life… Rather than just seeing us as another name on the paper making the grade. Additionally, if mangers want to get the most out of their millennial employees make it a point to break the ice and show some true colors. Here are a few tips:
The Quran states in Surah Ta Ha:
(1) “If you do not forgive, neither will your Father who is in heaven forgive you your sins” (Matthew 11:26). There remains no ground of excuse in the day of judgment — when you will be judged according to your own sentence. And whatever you have done, that you will also suffer.
Many weekends, you will find V and me sitting huddled at a table with 6 other people, in a school gym or church meeting hall or some such venue, trying to answer really random questions in a trivia fundraiser. It is a very St. Louis thing, apparently.
With all these things a student can take advantage of and really could use to succeed it’s a shame that most students don’t know about the center. If not the services that help you then you will find some of the nicest people working and hanging out in there. For more information you can go to the Academic Resource Center’s website at http://webster.edu/arc/. Although the best way to find out more is to check it out for yourself and visit the A.R.C yourself.
- THE KRAKEN
But Miss Hooters and Rose
Also, don’t confuse a record label with a talent agency. This is a common mistake for western fans of Asian music. Though Johnnys has a few in house record labels, they also have talent under different labels in Japan. A talent agency is just a managing company for the most part, though they might own in house record labels. What I mean by an “in house” record label is a record label that is owned by a talent agency, but operates as a separate company.
To celebrate, I will be holding a series of online events starting this month. These events have been set up to mirror the content of the book. Each and every one will offer you an opportunity to experience the inner workings of these talented artists as a true art insider. Mark your calendars, save the dates, and get ready to take The Pulse of Mixed Media...
You don’t have to forgive—and you certainly don’t have to forget!—in order to move on, in order to heal, in order to live a new story with a better outcome. You don’t have to wait for someone else to wake up, feel remorse, apologize, make amends; you don’t have to wrestle with judgment or sentencing or time off for good behavior or concurrent terms. You heal by getting to safety, and by not giving up any more of your precious time, energy, or life to people who hurt you. You heal by extracting the psychological shrapnel one memory at a time, and you listen carefully as each hard metal fragment hits the pan. The bullets aren’t part of you anymore, but if someone else needs to know how to dodge one, or what to do when hit, you are the person who remembers, and tells them what they need to hear.
3. I’m writing my pièce de résistance. I’ve struggled with it for so long that it will never stop fighting with me.
Last winter seemed like it would never end. By the end of March 2011, I never wanted to see a snow shovel again.
80. Romanowski - Days & Daze (7:07)
If your bridal party is made up of a fair number of wee ones, why not really let them have a ball and include the theme of a dress up party on your day as a princess, letting them accessorize at will? Provide a treasure trove of pretty things (I dug through my grandmother's costume jewelry, but thrift shops are full of inexpensive vintage baubles), which of course would make perfect gifts for your attendants. Put in a small veto clause, and you add an entirely playful element to your day! So, while we set up the table of sweets, our little princesses and our bride fancied themselves up with diamonds and pearls!
Sweet Valley High #2: Secrets
your liquid items as you may not need to pack hairspray, leave-in conditioner, or styling gel.
10…make a media kit.
Also, when you consult with your Canadian, remember that his kind are among the planet’s savviest cold-weather pragmatists. They have black belts in removing just enough snow from roofs, wrapping wet pipes with towels and other reachables, and striking a golden mean in sartorial layering.
3) Write your answers to these questions and don’t worry about how it flows or even that you’re using good grammar. Just get your ideas on paper (or into the computer). Notice that by now, you have at least a page written. Pat yourself on the back and keep going.
Have you ever made your own refried beans? How about freezing them or other beans? I'm learning that just about anything can be frozen if you do it right...
So, where can we pick up pony kegs of GOOD beer? (Don't tell me to brew my own. I know. I'm just starting to get my head wrapped around that, and you really wouldn't want to subject my coworkers to a first batch.)
I am watching the PGA golf tournament. Tiger is up by four strokes right now, and I hope he pulls it out. Why am I cheering for Tiger? That's a good question, since his "fall from grace". I guess I want to see the current records broken. And he is the most likely to do that in the near future. Of course, if he breaks Jack's records, someone like Rory McIlroy will come along and break Tiger's. And I probably will cheer for him, too, if I live long enough. I think I just like to see new records set in sports. (Except when Hank Aaron's record was broken.)
My son, who is an excellent athlete, good student, and a great kid - did not receive any awards.
……When cleanups happen, people get mad,” Glaser said. “This is its own city. Within every city there are people who freeload, who make people’s lives miserable. We just deal with it. We can’t kick them out.”
I love the roses in the summer, but the peonies and the irises in the spring
Once per month clean the inside of your stove.
Grazing animals require nutrients for maintenance energy needs, growth and development, milk production and fetal growth and development. The challenge of the livestock manager is to leave enough pasture forage after grazing to maintain some leaf tissue for light interception to generate energy for above- and below-ground growth.
I came out of it unscathed and I mark it down as one of the best hikes I’ve had. Usually I’m excited at finding one new waterfall. I found so many on this day I lost count. I’ve compiled some of my favorite shots of the day. I wish I had the photography skills and the camera to have really done these falls justice but this is as good as it gets with what I have. No special effects here. Just about the way I saw them that day. Going through them brought back a great memory of a lot of waterfalls and a really wet hike.
I've recently had a play around with my blog, and made a new header, but after seeing how the light has caught her wings I think I'm going to be changing my header to have this cutie on.
“It is of great importance for resident students on campus to rest as much as possible. Living on campus can cause anxiety during finals due to the change in class schedule and atmosphere of the student body,” said Melchione.
Was a penis bigger than his own!
Brooch: Ebay
Fear Factory and All That Remains - Doors open at 6:30 p.m. – Town Ballroom
In the back
If you’re a Christian, you might look upon what Tim Tebow is up to and praise God for it. And go ahead if you want to—a fellow believer is out there in the public eye telling the world that God is responsible for all of his success. How on earth, you ask, is this a bad thing?
When it was all said and done, we got exactly what we were looking for. I love the way the light plays off the cover of the pendant.
LOL! He said, "Yeah, Lex get to eat meat." Then he stood up while the tram was moving for like the fiftieth time. Then he and Lexi got into a deep conversation about whether or not we're made out of meat. Finally, they all spazzed their heads off.
This might have been true 1000 years ago during the Middle Ages when a town would have one blacksmith, and one shoe maker, and one carpenter. Any of these tradesmen would jealously guard the skills and knowledge of their profession because if too many people had the skill to make swords or shoes or wooden stuff, they wouldn't go to those guys for service.
1/2 t pure vanilla extract
“This is delicious.” Kates.
In parting, a little photo of Pips and Lila napping on their cat tree the other day, looking particularly scruffy, as they'd been wrestling and it is now static electricity season here as the humidity drops for the winter. ;-)
½ cup light brown sugar
at least Ill have them all stitched into one piece.
So, am I coming back? Well not all the way yet. I want my family to think I've completely went over to my new blog. When I feel that has happened I will make my way back here to good old Blogger. I like it because it sounds like booger.
And she's really nice!
Thursday early morning, she woke with a fever of 102.5 and that is when the worry set in...a few phone calls later, we were told to go to the ER where her surgery was done. We saw like 5 Drs from the Neuro Dept and she was again admitted( after waiting 9 hours in ER) We were worried about Meningitis.
in so doing makes the film’s most important statement about how even the briefest life can be one well lived. This is not a movie about learning to appreciate life’s significant moments, but one about how to proactively create them for yourself and share them with others Besides a few clunky musical cues, Death of a Superhero is directorially assured. It’s certainly a worthy film, but the teases of greatness we get early on set too high a bar for a film about something sensitive, like a kid with cancer. The film needs a few things in order to avoid being a total drag, but it’s these very things—the humorous best friends, the sex and relationship subplot—that hold it back.
Since our party was around a meal time. I decided to make some meaty goodness in addition to the cheese plate. I used this recipe for chocolate honey ribs from The Food Site with a few tweaks. Instead of melted chocolate, I used cocoa powder to make sure that it was gluten free. I also used gluten free soy sauce instead of regular soy sauce, and added a few dashes of liquid smoke. Instead of regular ribs, I used pork riblets. I really enjoyed the ribs and the sweet fatty goodness the honey and chocolate brought.
As you're reading with your child, make sure you point out things like table of contents, bold words, or the glossary. Talk about new words and see if they can relate their learning to something they already know. For example, one of the books we read today, described a polar bear's paws as webbed. Many kids knew that frogs' feet are webbed too, which helps them to swim. We learned this in a book we read last month and kids were able to use their schema and make that connection.
too?
Having written that down I can now see how crazy my thinking is!! Just because I may overreact with rage does not mean that my anger is invalid. It is still MY anger, it is part me, therefore deserves to exist! By denying the anger, am I therefore denying a part of myself?
Again, like Shaq, this grizzled veteran is not going to able to carry a big load on his own. However, combine their forces and they might be able to create a formidable force up front.
How it is delicious beyond description.
It’s been one of those weeks.
After the gym we took treats to the preschool I used to work at. Ryann was Kenzie's big helper, and rocked some activities like a pro. I think she would definitely thrive in a Montessori environment, she loves that stuff. After nap we busted out the water colors. And while Chris was at a bachelor party Ryann and I had ourselves a girls night.
With the end of this current round of edits rapidly approaching, I’ve been checking reviews of comparable books on Amazon and Barnes and Noble. It’s a good way to gauge how potential customers might see my book, and a good indication of their willingness to pick it up.
"Corliss saw me and gave me a recipe for dinner," I explained. "You know what they say - Possum is good eatin'."
Eventually, the sum of the small annoyances begins to exceed your capacity for patience and rational thought. All it would take to send you over the edge into a bottomless pit of angry hysteria is just one more tiny, little thing...
We became friends on Facebook, as people do nowadays. That was when I realised that Lianne was so much more than just a pretty face. She had great taste in books. She could write. She was interesting. But, most importantly, she had listed the Marquis de Sade as the person who inspired her. That’s when I knew she was our girl.
His moments were far and in between, but they were grand. The longer we went not talking, the more he missed me.
8 Facts About ME:
I’m always drawn to stories about overcoming physical disabilities, and Taylor’s premise is one I hadn’t come across before, particularly in the young adult genre. How devastating a blow to lose the power of speech at the brink of adulthood, when ideas are bright and brimming to be expressed. While I love to read from the teenage male perspective, too often in contemporary stories the narrative voice is filled with so much cultivated bravado that it makes it difficult for me to like the protagonist. I’m sure that the cliché of a teenage male whose main pastimes include swearing, drinking, drugs, sex, and sports is an accurate description of at least some members of the male populace, but it’s hardly representative of most. Jake was a welcome change from the typical, providing a glimpse into the mind of a young man refreshingly well-adjusted and exceedingly normal. Some might read this as boring, but I felt it much more honest and was immediately drawn into Jake’s struggles in the aftermath of his accident.
PANCAKES.
Jesse: Alright, you know what? I’m just…happy to see you, even if…you’ve become an angry, manic depressive activist. I still like you! I still enjoy being around you!
The answer of many software developers to restrictions imposed by the proprietary software companies was to produce open source software and publish it online on sites such as Sourceforge. According to the Economist, some 9500 researchers are following the same path by publishing their research on less restricted sites.
“Step out of the van please.”
Anonymous is not an award grabbing movie, nor is it a terrible film. If you are a conspiracy fan this may interest you. Any true lover of Shakespeare will dispute all claims and it is most likely a theory that will never be proven and will stay just that, a theory.
28. You have reached a real person. If you feel you’ve reached me in error and prefer an automated system, contact 800-SPAM-BOT.
Verbal abuse isn’t restricted to use of particular words; even our tone of voice may render us guilty of being abusive. When we give orders to other people or comment on certain behaviours, it could be seen as an attack on the other person which could result in damaging relationships forever. Verbal abuse could even be more detrimental to a person’s well-being than any physical abuse.
This stamp set can be yours for just $5 with a qualifying purchase of $50. Otherwise this stamp set is $17.95. Now it is ONLY available for the month of May. Then it will be gone forever, so get it while you can!
I tried out the sock curls for this meeting and I have to say even with blowing rain and then snow I still had curls at the end of the day instead of frizz!!! I’ll take it! Also I’m still not 100% sure about wearing this scarf. Rectangle scarves are easier, but squares???
These iconic pieces were manufactured both in Germany & the U.S.A.
"Yeah." I nod. "You did house that!"
Some of the features of these fiascos are –
Twit twit twit
As we venture into Spring here in Australia one of my favourite things is seeing all the buds and new life spring up from nowhere, not to mention the warm breezes ... what a welcome relief from the bitter cold winds of Winter...can you tell my favourite seasons are Spring and Summer..!?.
The version we are going to do is a savory version which we’ll top with syrup. You can also do a strictly sweet version, but I think the whole notion of that is insipid — you really want the contrast of the savory and sweet together.
We did save the best for last however...
2 Corinthians 11:14-15
It's so nice to be able to see everything, and not have to paw through a big pile of bags every time I get into the cupboard.
Nausharo
In that cross carved by loving hands is a holy subversion. It heralds change more radical that mankind’s most fevered dreams. Its followers expand the boundaries of a kingdom that can never fail. A shining kingdom that reaches into the darkest corners of every community into the darkest corners of every mind. A kingdom of deathless hope, of restless virtue, of endless peace.
Back at the stable, Smith runs out of bullets and we see a rotting bullet-riddled body of the Price boy pull a pistol and shoot Smith dead.
“We are so excited to be part of the legendary championship that is the root of professional motocross racing,” said Donnie Emler Jr., Brand and Marketing Director for FMF Racing. “FMF has played an essential role in competitive racing since my father Don Emler, owner and founder, started the company in 1973, and then in 1974, when we powered Marty Smith and won the very first AMA National 125cc Championship.”
The smile flashed quickly across his face and was gone, “Civilian all the way. I don’t want to like you because you’ve got something I want. You’ve got Meg.”
But first we retired to his study, the small room in the middle of the house in which he wrote all twenty of his books (including his single non-fiction work, 1990's The Eyes of the Fleet: A Popular History of Frigates and Frigate Captains) – although parts of some of those books were also written "in my mother-in-law's boiler room in Eastbourne". Two walls of bookshelves – bearing a variety of novels and historical works, plus a box set of Sopranos videos – frame his desk, on which rests a computer, although it is not hooked up to the internet; Price is interested in technological advances such as email, but is not online himself. Bookcases also line some of the hallways in the house and the reception room, including one entire case holding nothing but editions of his own novels.
What’s your favourite ‘smell’ word?
* my wonderful family and friends up in Ohio
For example, in 1985 the average Chinese consumer ate 44 pounds of meat per year. Today, it’s more than doubled to 110 pounds. That in of itself is impressive, but when you consider that it takes 17 pounds of grain to generate one pound of beef, you begin to see how grain demand can rise exponentially to population growth with even modest changes to diet.
At my table I sipped on my sweet tea and chowed down on the sweetmeats provided. When the young waiter came to clear my table away I cautiously enquired as to where the wagon or carriage offices were, as I wanted to buy tickets to travel. He shrugged and said he would ask the owner and disappeared. It was several minutes before I realised that the old man sitting at the next table (while his family walked around the park, he later told me) was trying to catch my eye. I smiled at him politely. He took this as an invitation to ask me where I was going to. As I thought he might be able to help me I told him: Ankh-Morpork.
He said, “William, get down from there, right now!”
The only way is by continually bringing you to the Chief Shepherd, and bringing him to you. What I can never do, he can.
My challenge to you, the author, is to throw yourself upon the gears of big publishing.
“Where is heaven?” April asks.
On that note...Happy Friday! Haha.
14. Cole Porter - What a Nice Municipal Park
It gave me a perspective on the business of advertising much wider than just having creative awards as a benchmark.
I must confess this took me some time to get my head around for quite a while lol,
Similar triglyphs and recessed doors can be found in the description of Solomon’s temple (1 Kings 6, Verses 5, 31-33, and in the description of a temple by the prophet Ezekiel 41:6). These biblical texts are replete with obscure technical terms that have lost their original meaning over the millennia. Now, with the help of the stone model uncovered at Khirbet Qeiyafa, the biblical text is clarified. For the first time in history we have actual objects from the time of David, which can be related to monuments described in the Bible.
09 I Don't Like Mondays
She then sang her 2008 single Gunpowder and Lead, about a woman who plans on shooting her abusive ex-husband after his release from jail.
Paw Painting $2.00 for a matted picture/$3.00on canvas
Our home study was just approved by the state. We don’t even have the paperwork back yet. A note went out through the portal system that Bethany uses to contact everyone that had a listing of new waiting children in China. Anyone who has had their home study approved can request a match to the children on the list. We can even request a match to more than 1 but they would only match us to 1. Nick and I took a look at the list separately. We looked up the medical histories, videos, and pictures of all the little boys that were in the age range we were hoping for. (Remember I had been praying for God to show us who He had chosen for us?) We found 2 that we felt a connection to and that we thought would be a good match for our family. Both of us chose the same 2!!! I put in our request and we truly thought that it was too soon. That there would be other families further along in the process who would be a better match for these boys. Remember, we were still waiting for the paperwork to come back from the state so we could pass it along to the federal level and get approved there. I knew it would be in God’s timing and not ours anyways but it couldn’t hurt to let them know we felt connected to these 2 little boys.
What shall we tell you? Tales, marvelous tales
That said, the founding fathers did make one slip in grammatical structure that, technically, translates to the prohibition of ANYONE becoming president. Impossible, you say? Read the following carefully.
Imagine what it must have been like for the inmates who were imprisoned here?
My biggest piece of advice is “Just Do It”.
As a teacher I am always warning students of the dangers and unethicality of copying and pasting the work of others with neither permission nor accreditation but next time I will have this cautionary tale from Catania to back up my admonitions:
Happy Hump Day! I have a sneak peek for you today from Fred She Said! Isn't it lovely?
We finally found a spot to fish and by this time, I was so exhausted that I didn’t care one bit about the cigar smoking fisherman to our left staring out at the water while his pole was comfortably reclined on the ground. Takoda of course was standing in his line and I almost didn’t care as I thought if this fisherman can’t even hold the pole, how dedicated is he to this fishing thing? If he was going to come at me with words of Takoda being obnoxious, I was going to reply with “So is that cigar.” My inner thoughts could cease because he moved on. We managed to chase him off in less that four minutes. Score.
Sometimes one obstacle or challenge can actually provide the solution for another one. For example: I got divorced this past winter. Not a good experience in itself or a great way to overcome introversion, but I found I "needed" to earn money and I "needed" to speak up and ask questions. So, I had to do a lot of things that did not come easily to me and being introverted wasn't an excuse anymore. I feel comfortable on the internet. So I pitch myself with my blog, website, Facebook, etc. I still don't like talking on the phone, though.
Brown Rice Pasta ( I got mine from Trader Joe's)
I was up at 6 am this morning, and made a gourmet breakfast of french toast, fruit, and bacon. Okay, maybe not gourmet, but it was not Eggos or cold cereal. I cleaned the kitchen, made the beds, responded to work emails, and did a load of laundry before the preschool run at 8:45am. And I still had energy. I still went to Starbucks and got a chai tea latte, but because I wanted to, not because if I didn't have the caffeine there was a good chance I would fall asleep during storytime at the library.
The following was emailed to everyone in my company, which amounts to several hundred people. The author works in a different city, and I've never met him. I can only assume the author will not get a positive reference in the future. Identifying info removed.
09. Wang Dang Doodle (Dixon) 5:10
Bye!
children at their home while
So here I am with Gestational Diabetes. Since I was at work when I found out, I couldn't really process it all out, I had groups, notes, assessments, paperwork, shit to get done. On my way home I talked to Julie, cried then, talked to Mike, cried then and when I got home, talked to my dad and cried then. Mike then got home and I cried some more. Lots of tears that day. A lot of it was because I had no clue what to do now, I know nothing about diabetes, don't know anyone that has ever had gestational diabetes-so I could just call them up and ask all the questions-, and then had the feeling I was hurting our little girl---Worst. Feeling. Ever. as a mommy!
Regular readers will have followed many of the trials and tribulations, early demos, tantrums, tiaras, the 'you name it I have been through it' traumas of making of this album here on axevictim.com - which as you have probably guessed is not actually my name although I do actually respond now to either Axe or Axey. Both of which is a huge irony as far as I am concerned, but so what? I'm just glad that I had the foresight to register axevictim.com as my own domain name in spite of my stealing it from the title of the debut album by Be Bop Deluxe, one of my favorite English bands of all time. Sorry Bill, but I got in first, so fuck off because it's too late for you now. The quick or the dead and all that.
I do feel that the more we are informed the more able we are to make up our minds about contentious issues such as immigration. I hope that my novel will help to provide some of the facts and challenge some of the myths about immigration and particularly asylum seekers, while at the same presenting an exciting story with convincing characters.
I want to hug her at the most random times, see her smile because I made a silly joke. Walk hand in hand with her while we go places, and laugh at stupid dumb things. Look into her eyes and see the passionate fire in her eyes.
Maybe I will learn a new craft like pottery or painting…. or maybe I will try spin classes… Maybe I will try some new recipes (most likely), or organize my closet, or rearrange the furniture…..ooh! or maybe I will finally learn to sew! I have a sewing machine which I purchased a few years ago that I have never even turned on…I just haven’t really been all that motivated until now…..how sad is that. Maybe I will do all of the above or maybe I will do something completely different that I haven’t even thought of yet….I just seem to be craving something new and I have a strong desire to stay busy! I also seem to be craving travel and adventure! I think I will start planning something to satisfy this desire very soon… a day or weekend road trip somewhere should do the trick for now!
There were a couple of points I picked up on and wanted to mention on here. David Townson started with a video about design and design students today. It highlighted the points that Generation Y-ers have the ability to challenge authority, collaborate and co-create with others. I thought the amazing thing was that we are being educated for jobs that don't exist yet, we are 'technology natives' ( I think that was the term he used) and we are being "shaped by [our] times" (Times Online, 20 May 2007). David Townson said that it was good to develop thoughts about what to do after University, we have to accept that we might not be guaranteed a place in a workplace specific to our discipline. All of this seems so far away, but I had a moment of realisation, we are coming to the end of our second year, in two more years we will be finished our degree and out on our own to fend for ourselves among the 250,000 odd other graduates (Times Online, 20 May 2007) out looking for jobs. The lectures this year have already made me think more about the design world. I don't think I came here expecting to come out as a textile designer working for a fashion label or a big interiors company, but now I am more aware of other areas, for example service design. And I think that working in an area like that would be really interesting, challenging and exciting.
If you would like to get involved in a swap or giveaway there are three brilliant ones just being launched (is that the right word?!) that you should have a look at......
and this is the sun's birthday;this is the birth
The lorry has stopped in the slip road ahead and the lorry driver is coming along with two other women, one of whom is on the phone. She is phoning for the police and an ambulance.
Technology used positively – seems a way of ameliorating the effects of our addiction (if only it seems worth doing).
Suddenly, almost out of thin air, we found ourselves surrounded by an honour guard of babushkas. They pushed and fought their way to the front of the business class queue, having formed a sort of cordon around the boys and myself, and carried us along with them. Any foreign business-class traveller green enough not to know the score and to question their right to do this was firmly put in their place as it was pointed out that I had young children with me and that they should be ashamed of themselves for not stepping out of the way without being asked. Needless to say, I was not travelling on a business class ticket. Needless to say, when faced with my security detail of formidable babushkas, the woman on the check-in desk passed the three of us through without comment...
The National Review normally worships at the altar of the free market, but whenever average people leverage market forces to spread awareness or advance an agenda, Ayn Rand suddenly turns into Karl Marx. Boycotts — most recently, the campaign against Rush Limbaugh’s advertisers — are slammed as suppression of free speech rather than vote-with-your-feet expressions of the otherwise-vaunted principle of consumer choice. Of course, the outrage is highly selective; as Ari Melber of The Nation writes in a Politico opinion piece, “ALEC set out to advance ‘free-market’ values in state politics. Now it is experiencing the impact of politics in the free market.”
One part of my problem is that I have the attention span of a gnat. I get all amped up to do something, set my goals, pep-talk myself to death and then enact Phase I of The Plan. Weight loss, grad school, race training -- it doesn't matter, I inevitably end up a week or two in to it and suddenly find that something else is more interesting and I want to do that instead. This is why it was just short of a miracle that I actually spent 12 straight weeks committed to the same goal and actually finished the half; some recycling plant floor here in Boston is littered with the remains of countless 5k and 10k training plan efforts I started and abandoned before that.
It’s really a slight pain in the ass to type a letter on an iPad. Maybe I just need to get used to it.
She has travelled the world, and is passionate about learning and researching healthy food, eating, cooking, natural remedies and organic products and presenting these in an easy to read format to encourage healthy living for everyone.
The real answer is the Canadian video game awards not only lived up to expectations but exceeded them. But wait why did the show disappoint some viewers? Simple those who only viewed the televised version missed out on over an hour of the actual award show. Sadly it appears the viewers simply missed out.
Hell, I think CoC with some Cro-Magnon Man tribesmen might even be worth a whirl.
I never had very good equipment nor the talent to play/produce these songs as I would have liked.
Toy Story (Joss Whedon, Andrew Stanton, Joel Cohen and Alec Sokolow. Story by John Lasseter, Peter Docter, Andrew Stanton and Joe Ranft).
Me: Because then you would say I was nagging you.
This has to be due to the hard work of the town development manager
Don't need to say please to no man for a happy tune
Also fresh from a craft class I attended last night I decided to make a Neverending Card - take a look
2 thanks
because of x, y and z- and both of those come down to issues of
All in all it was definitely a fun time, minus the potential bruising tomorrow. I promise to try and take pictures at Wednesday’s class.
He wanted to hang it over his bed so I needed to go an earthquake safe route. (i.e. no glass.)
Home… the place where they should be able to go for comfort and healing and safety, was actually the place they would instead get sicker and sicker…and maybe eventually…. die.
Cardiff City (0) v Crystal Palace (1) – Tuesday 7.45 – Live on BBC2
This is a 3 song EP that Joel and I recorded at Louder Studios in SF with 2 acoustic guitars and a piano. It is 3 Howlin Rain songs rendered into mutant acoustic versions. We mostly just ran tape and played and sang with a piano overdub or a vocal overdub here or there when we felt we could do better or to round it out. It was a quick little session that we did in one evening in some left over time from a mastering or editing session that was for something else to do with preparation for Magnificent Fiend's release back in late '07. I just came across them and took a listen the other day and they sound raw but beautiful and ghostly to me. More like ghosts than old songs and recordings usually sound to me. I Especially dig the haunted saloon piano vibe and "Romancing The Stone" soundtrack-esque acoustic solo. The proper accompaniment drink for this EP is a tall Vodka with Club Soda and plenty of fresh Lime. AKA the Tim Green fave.
The infringing copies storing place provided in the preceding paragraph means such a place as used to store or shelter infringing copies in a large quantity or for business purposes; and the infringing copies seizure and detention place provided in the preceding paragraph means the place where the customs, the copyright administration authorities, the industry and commerce administration authorities, or any other competent administrative authorities takes lawful seizure or detention of the infringing copies.
A church group comes out to stand at my base.
And Scream,
my second (and last) child, my son, started kindergarten this year and it has been so much fun watching him grow up but it's also a little bittersweet since his milestone list is being marked off a little faster that i was prepared for.
In 2009, the "climategate" e-mails showed scientists in the IPCC’s inner circle cheating, hiding data, proposing to delete data, manipulating graphs, plotting to bully journals who dared to publish papers questioning climate alarm, and generally perverting science. This scientific corruption was made worse by establishment "investigations" that more or less said that such gross violations of scientific ethics are acceptable in climate science.
For the coaster based, I used white ceramic tiles. I liked the look of black ones, and even some stone ones, but I was trying to do this project on the super cheap, and white ceramic tiles were .10 each at Home Depot. Yeah. Ten cents. Buy extra just in case you drop a couple, or make mistakes in the process.
I have two haiku in Crannog 29. Crannog is edited by Tony O'Dwyer, Jarlath Fahy, Sandra Bunting and Gerardine Burke.
you'd expect the inner redneck inside of me to lash out at the "beautician." Nope. I was speechless. That's what complete shock and horror will do to a person.
りんごのパウンドケーキか、りんごミニマフィンのどちらにしようか迷いましたが、
‘The materials sent to me indicate one of the strangest phenomenon in my memory,’ said the then US Attorney General Griffin Bell in a letter to senator Harrison Schmitt, according to The Sun newspaper.”
He had two CDs: Tom Jones’ Greatest Hits and Rachmaninov’s piano concertos 1 and 4 and Rhapsody on a Theme by Paganini. He hadn’t bought either. The first was a gift on his fortieth birthday and the second had been left in his cab by a tipsy accountant.
As a newbie pumper, I’ve been experimenting with different site locations. (Important lesson- do not try to place an infusion set somewhere that you wouldn’t give a normal shot). I’ve taken a liking to placing the infusion set in my upper arm. I like the different location and it causes no problem in cooler weather, but is slightly more problematic in warmer weather. Without sleeves, the site is often the victim of door frames, driver seats, sports bras, and stares. Yep- people stare. Some ask questions, opening a dialogue for some good old fashioned education. Or smart-ass responses.
The IFS said its estimates show the poorer families will feel the burden in the second half of the parliament when welfare cuts begin to affect and the two-year increase in child tax starts to vanish.
With such solid mathematical background a section of astrology was developed in to what we can term as Predicative Astrology of small natural cycles and human behavior. NASA observed for many years that the Indian astro-algorithm predictability of nature, weather patterns, rain fall, crop patterns is more accurate on dot than any thing they have seen. With the success of Indian astro-algorithms in large body systems of late the Western and American Law enforcement agencies are looking at western astrologer in their countries to track criminals, predict serial killers, find lost goods. Even politicians in west-against the wrath of church-are turning to wards astrologers.
Today is a good day, readers!
9pm-2am
Unlike the PB & J Ale from these guys there is no mistaking that this nutter beer is a stout. While the peanuts are masked in the sweetness of the oatmeal stout cherry essence that some oaties have, it doesn't go unnoticed and comes across much like its predecessor with a dry, brusk and oily nuttiness. While that might sound like a dried up nutsack or its equivalent it's really not off-putting at all and adds to the multi-layers of taste. All the dark chocoffee stout flavors are in there along with a slight sourness that goes along with my calling it a cherry tasting oatmeal stout. And it is.
That stopped the complaining about how “mean” I am but the whining continued. I had to quit feeding him myself in between his tears. He ultimately accomplished eating after about 45 minutes. I had turned off the Tv by this time of course. I’ve learned that having the Tv on or light music can positively overwhelm Jeremy.
Idiots. Gah.
My daughter can text 50 of her closest friends while walking to school; surely, I can learn to walk while sneaking quick looks for the money that is surely following me…somewhere. Should I slow down so it can catch up?
The gorgeous weather and the need to tidy up and get rid of the grass that we couldn’t ever really maintain to any level that would warrant it being called a ‘lawn’ stirred us into finally getting on with it last weekend.
Either way, this “old lady” decided to find out what’s new in the world of technology and came across some both stunning and disturbing videos that I decided to share with those in my office. Upon watching them, one of my colleagues responded by saying that Google is basically equivalent in power to The Terminator and as soon as it’s able to interface with his toaster, we’re all dead.
So here is a hair color spam! (There will be lots of photo spams in this post, as hair can be rather self explanatory)
“I don’t know what you mean.”
and a little bit sick
And so the answer to Sykes’s question: “And…who else would do this?”? Any number of people committed to “resisting a foreign occupation” for any number of political and religious reasons. How ugly, how obviously convenient, to lump all opposition together under the name of the West’s great bete noire, “al-Qaeda.”
There was to be one more miscarriage in the process before Daniel was successfully conceived...but it too was medically uneventful, not even requiring a D& C. I can't explain now why a second miscarriage didn't daunt me more, why I kept going despite it. I remember looking at Meggie and thinking about how wonderful she was, how it would all be worth it in the end. Obviously I'm glad it didn't deter me every time I look at my beautiful boy now.
Back to our authors, but I am going to change the wording to reflect collapse theories:
But, I also have to realize that when he gets back, that doesn't necessarily mean that I'll have all of those things again. This is kind of something I can wish for, but who knows what shift he'll have. I just have to pray that God takes care of us and continues to help me not be "needy."
After receiving the first letter naturally I was quite worried. My boss reasurred me, ‘we have a very good filing systems for Kens letters’ he said. Nudging the wastpaper basket with his foot.
Trigger: I am not the smallest person in the room.
American diplomacy is widely criticized because of our perceived arrogance and hypocrisy. Our detractors say that American diplomats lack vision, are manipulative, and not to be trusted. Frequently cited is America’s support of foreign dictators who abuse their own citizens and charges that we are too selective in condemning other countries for human rights violations. This is true.
This is what we had to say yesterday. Today (-1) may have the bulls on the offensive as Europe is closed for May Day and the attendant sovereign debt issues can be ignored for another day. Let’s see if they can make their case. The bulls are fighting the headwinds of Apple’s sudden influence by gravity. Watch the Leaders of the market – Apple. Trading range is still in place 1350-1400 on the S&P. See if bulls can push the ball over the line and hold their ground. That may be tough to do with elections in Greece and France coming. If bulls can’t hold the line with Europe closed it may portend further losses ahead and a test of the bottom of our trading range.
So back to work I go, hi-ho, and play will have to wait for another day, or at least till my desire for tea drives me to the kettle or a good song on the CD makes it impossible for my feet to stay still.
Caden- 7lbs 1oz at birth, now 22lbs 9oz
The wedding dress and bridesmaid dress orders typically take some time so beginning the dress hunt (see our previous posts on how to get that fabulous task started!!) is usually important. Choosing a bridal party (if you choose to that is) should also be done in the first few months. Not only is this proper etiquette, but its also essential to having assistance in all of these wedding tasks. Bridesmaids are an excellent source of help and support and while all of your real friends will be during this time, its helpful for them to know in advance as well as they are going to need to prepare emotionally, financially, as well as with their schedules.
Care in specifying the parties to an agreement ensures precise identification of licensing and licensed parties. For the licensor, this precludes the possibility of extending the licence beyond the intended entity or of not including all of the include entity. For the licensing party extend to the entire intended entity.
It was a quiet birthday celebration, but he seemed pretty pleased. The night before, he and Genius Golfer went to Salt Lake City and watched the AMA Motorcross finals at Rice Eccles stadium at the University of Utah. They had a great time. So, no party with friends, but lots of fun with family. That was a nice change too.
In the kingdom of God, which covers the whole world, “there is no longer a favoured people, a chosen people, all men and women of every country have become the chosen people,” the Lebanese-born Butros said.
And when they learn the money that can be both saved and earned from recycling and reusing products, they'll have developed an environmentally healthy and thrifty habit for life.
Let the riot ensue.
“My Lord God,
Then sitting back, wondering "where's the next pork chop?"
Preheat the oven to 150C. Line mini muffin pans with paper cases. Place the butter, sugar, eggs and flour in a large bowl and beat together until just smooth. Fold in the chocolate chips. Spoon the mixture into the paper cases.
It’s more like back in elementary school where I had a potentially hung-over teacher say she’d reward the quietest student with a piece of candy at the end of class. Only with German Ruhezeit (literally “quiet time”) no one will give you candy for your adherence. Unfortunately.
“Like lime for grass?”
One of my projects is the concept that “less is more” It’s a brand to encourage other people to be clear and concise about themselves as a brand but before we reach the level of branding let’s deal with the stuff that would take away from our God given brand.
Then she would walk the corridors, until she found the off-beat clock.
Add more green chillies if you want it spice or if you want a mild version, omit the green chilli altogether and add a half tsp of Kashmiri chilli powder instead.
Rebecca is on the far left
14. Jelaousy 1961
Beside the door, sang clearly all day long,
Trojan Records -45
I was sleeping blissfully one night a few weeks ago when I had a vivid, timeline-driven, action-packed dream. Usually, I don’t remember my dreams unless I’ve had a headache and am medicated with Tylenol P.M., but this one I remembered.
Pearls : Say it in Crystals by Prima marketing
I am slowly finding more fairly typical ones to add to it all, slowly is the operative word.
Bread From Heaven: You are correct. Jesus IS the Physical Bread that came down from Heaven. A better Bread than the Miracle of the Manna that came down from Heaven. The physical Bread that we eat is JESUS’ body,blood,soul, and divinity in the Eucharist, after plain bread has been consecrated by our priests. It is no longer mere bread but JESUS, under the appearance of Bread. We partake of this Bread that comes down from Heaven by a miracle, of God, through the hands of a priest, at each of our masses.
'Cause I ain't been nuttin' but bad.
they too believed in faerie tales…
